Authors
Heather Picker
Number of Reviews
27

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
     Directed by Paul Verhoeven. Written by Joe Eszterhas. Starring Michael
Douglas and Sharon Stone, with George Dzundza and Jeanne Tripplehorn. 1992, 130
min., R (available also in an unrated director's cut), see below for details.
    When "Basic Instinct" came out in 1992, audiences either loved it or
loathed it. Critics were much the same. Actually, most praised it if only done
at face value, for Joe Eszterhas' script is as full of holes as a piece of
Swiss cheese. Eszterhas was propelled to stardom, becoming Hollywood's highest
paid screenwriter, for this lackluster effort. Yes, the same Eszterhas who will
be best remembered for "Showgirls," for which he was unofficially inducted into
the screenwriter's hall of infamy and public laughingstock-hood. (Though I
don't believe it harmed the size of his paychecks.) There has been speculation
that he only turned in a rough draft of the script, but it is so terrible that
he doesn't really have a defense. In spite of this severe flaw, the film became
a box-office success. Sleek sets and steamy sex aren't enough to make this the
seriously suspenseful film it could have been, though it's potential is evident
and we are luckily given glimpses of what a good thriller should be.
     Detective Nick Curran (Michael Douglas) and his partner Gus (George
Dzundza) are investigating the murder of a "civic" minded ex rock star that was
stabbed to death with an ice pick while in the throes of sexual passion. His
casual lover of the past year and a half, Catherine Tramell (Sharon Stone)
becomes the main suspect, and with good reason. After the boating death of her
parents, she inherited around one hundred-ten million dollars, and now, at the
age of thirty, after earning college degrees in both literature and psychology,
she is living the good life with girlfriend Roxy (Leilani Sarelle) and writing
books under the pseudonym Catherine Woolf. Her last novel is suspiciously exact
in its depiction of the ice pick stabbing of a thrill-seeking, aging rocker.
     Nick has a shady past. He had a cocaine problem, was an alcoholic, has
shot four people, two who were innocent bystanders, and it is suggested that
his behavior led to the suicide of his wife. Catherine's sob story is
elaborated, but it is still hard to think of her as anything but a brilliant
seductress. Both Nick and Catherine are desperately dysfunctional, but Nick
can't hide his tendencies the way Catherine can. Given these two main
characters, who are hard to feel anything for, it is poetic justice that the
murderous (past?) drug user, and all around despicablewait, that applies to
both. Ah, all the more perfect. This is one of the major downfalls of the
script, but it is also why it is believable on the surface. It is shoved down
our throats that these are tragic and doomed characters, and an underlying
tension is provided in the various edits of the film (material was excised for
television that places Nick in an even more unfavorable light), by Nick and
Catherine to similar degrees. Of course, either way he is constant danger of
being seduced by Catherine. (If only he had paid more attention when she told
him that her next book was going to be about a police detective who winds up
dead.)
     The US version was submitted several times to the ratings board to get an
R instead of an NC-17, the television edit was prepared by Verhoeven, and many
of the scenes were drastically altered, in turn causing the viewer's perception
of Nick to possibly be changed. The unrated director's cut was screened in
Europe, and is available on laserdisc, video, and DVD in the United States. In
addition to the problems with ratings, gay rights activists who thought that
the lesbianism and bisexuality was handled irresponsibly picketed "Basic
Instinct." I disagree with their qualms.
     Roxy was not likable, although it was easy to feel sorry for her. Most
people in the movie were unlikable. And there is no disputing that Catherine
was cold and calculating and used sex to get whatever she wanted. Does that
defame bisexuals? No more than Nick disparages heterosexual men.  Did anyone
complain about that? He wasn't nearly as smart as Catherine, and it is quite
apparent that he is sleeping with her only because he has to do something, and
he certainly can't compete with her in the intelligence/mind game departments.
The most telling scene in the film, and one illustrating that the film is not
homophobic, is the one that angered so many.
     Following one of Nick and Catherine's soft-porn, exhausting sex
diversions, Nick goes into the bathroom, where he encounters Roxy, who tells
him that if he doesn't leave Catherine alone she will kill him. Nick asks Roxy
to talk to him "man to man." But the scene is more visually representative of a
statement against Nick, or in a broader sense, men, as he is naked and Roxy is
clothed, thus putting her in the position of power. And Nick was smug, and
thought that Roxy was jealously watching him do something with Catherine that
she couldn't. Of course, the tables are turned when it is revealed that
Catherine knows about the watching and encourages it. Now it is Roxy's turn to
be smug.
     Okay, enough of that. Director Paul Verhoeven (Robocop, Total Recall) gets
to shoot a lot of nudity and sex. This will attract some, well, probably most
viewers. I found myself detached from the movie enough that I saw the sex
scenes as ploys to maintain interest. The more liberal critical viewpoint would
be that the graphic sex and violence contained in "Basic Instinct" is necessary
to understand the story, and, more importantly, character (mainly Catherine)
motivation. The famous interrogation sequence, however, is the scene best
surmising her (though it can still be considered gratuitous, either reinforcing
or downsizing the concept).
     Michael Douglas is right for the role of self-assured Nick. "Fatal
Attraction" will be compared to this picture, and the parallels are there, but
"Basic Instinct" is stylized, unabashed smut, while the former aspired to a bit
more. Douglas more than pulls off Nick, who was written in a way that would
have proved troublesome for other, less versatile actors. He manages to be
edgy, threatening, and disbelieving while at the same time being vulnerable,
naďve, and the resulting gullible; all done realistically. Douglas adds the
depth that makes one wonder if Nick knows his fate and just doesn't care.
     Sharon Stone has the most complex role, at least on paper. She has managed
to rise above the material presented and convincingly portrays this diabolical
and wounded character. Recently, I saw her interviewed on the program "Inside
the Actor's Studio." When asked by host James Lipton if, in her opinion,
Catherine ends up killing Nick, she automatically said yes and when prompted to
elaborate, said, "He had to die," going on to explain that in the mind of
Catherine, it was either or her or him, because someone had to go. And right
she is.
     The supporting cast makes the predictable story a bit easier to watch.
Jeanne Tripplehorn poses an intriguing figure as a police psychologist, past
girlfriend (of more than one character) and all around hard to decipher
onlooker and potential participant. Dorothy Malone is back in a nice, if brief
role as a friend of Catherine's with a murderous history. Wayne Knight
("Jurassic Park" and seen weekly as Officer Don on "Third Rock From the Sun")
is amusing as a lawyer, and Leilani Sarelle is a standout as Roxy, the oddly
sympathetic character, and George Dzundza seems well cast but has little to do
as Nick's ill-fated partner, Gus.  (Did any other viewers of "Law & Order" find
themselves envisioning the movie as an episode instead? That way, at least,
Dzundza would have had a partner that was better suited him, and even if Chris
Noth's Detective Mike Logan didn't triumph over Catherine, we would at least
have had someone to grieve for.)
     Overall, the film comes across as a skin flick with a good cast. Attentive
viewers may have noticed the numerous Hitchcock rip-offs (there were too many
for them to be considered references or homage), beginning with the opening
crane shot. Almost all of the San Francisco shots, most noticeably the ones of
the Golden Gate Bridge, looked like they had been lifted straight from
"Vertigo." When Catherine's hair is pulled into a bun, she bears a striking
resemblance to Kim Novak (in "Vertigo"). Another idea that was stolen is a
slight variation on the lengthy talking and lips brushing scene that Ingrid
Bergman and Cary Grant made history with in "Notorious." Sampling may be
artistic licensing in the music world, but in movies it seems more like
plagiarism. The film's score, composed by Jerry Goldsmith (LA Confidential)
sounds Bernard Hermann-ish. It is the best attempt at imitation in the movie.
     "Basic Instinct" is a typical potboiler that fails to hold up under
dissection. Verhoeven has done better, nothing extraordinary is expected from
or delivered by Eszterhas, but Douglas is dependable as usual. His similarly
unsympathetic turn in "A Perfect Murder," and his strong title role in "The
American President" have led me to believe that he is one of the most
underrated actors currently working. And Stone is nothing short of a
revelation. After a decade of admittedly weak work, she made a strong and
lasting impression, and has since established herself as a respected actress.
(Later winning a Golden Globe and an Academy Award nomination for Martin
Scorsese's hit "Casino," and garnering more critical acclaim for her role in
1998s "The Mighty.")
     Notes: Rated R for nudity, sex, violence, and profanity.  The unrated
version has more explicit scenes of sex and violence.  
     DVD Details: Widescreen, production notes, theatrical trailer(s). 
Currently, the DVD is only available as the R-rated theatrical cut.  A DVD with
the same features as the Special Edition director's cut laserdisc is reportedly
in the works.  
     The Verdict: "Basic Instinct" falls flat.  So unless you're into bad
scripts that strong performances can't salvage, skip it in favor of "Vertigo." 
If you're looking for a bravura Stone performance, check out "Casino."
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
     Directed by Tony Kaye. Written by David McKenna. Starring Edward Norton,
with Edward Furlong, Avery Brooks, and Stacy Keach. 1998, 119 min., Rated R.
     "American History X" gained publicity when director Tony Kaye publicly
denounced the version that was going to be distributed. He wanted his name to
be removed, and 'Humpty Dumpty' put in it's place, claiming that the film's
star, Edward Norton ("Primal Fear," "Rounders"), had re-edited it to give
himself more screen time. Ultimately, the movie would gain more publicity when
Norton garnered an Academy Award nomination for Best Actor. His performance is
truly stirring; the saving grace of a story with tremendous potential because
of it's social relevance, but one that fails to rise above average.
     Daniel Vinyard (Edward Furlong, "Pecker") is a high school student who
turned in a report about Hitler's "Mien Kampf." His alarmed teacher takes the
paper to Principal Sweeney (Avery Brooks), who calls Daniel into his office and
tells him that from now on he will report to Sweeney for a class called
American History X. By the next morning Daniel must have turned in to him a new
report, this time about his older brother, Derek (Norton). Earlier in the day,
Derek had been released from prison after doing time for killing two young
black men whom he'd caught breaking into his car a few years ago.
     Daniel arrives home and we're given a more formal introduction to his
apparently racist background. His mother Doris (Beverly D'Angelo), sister
Davina (Jennifer Lien), and younger sister, are fawning over Derek. The
brother's hug and Daniel shows Derek a white power tattoo. Derek wants to know
when he got it, and doesn't seem pleased. Seth (Ethan Suplee), the token
hulking idiot of their circle of acquaintances, arrives, and he, too, is given
an inexplicably chilly reception by Derek, who obviously has other things on
his mind.
     As Daniel writes his report, black and white flashbacks of what happened
the night Derek was arrested begin. The flashbacks comprise a large part of the
one-minute less than two hour running time of the movie. Derek's mysterious
behavior continues when he tells Daniel not to go the party that is being
thrown that night for the white supremacist group at the home of Cameron
Alexander (Stacy Keach). Of course, Daniel goes anyway, and is shocked and
feeling betrayed when Derek has a private confrontation with Cameron that
escalates into Seth pointing a gun at Derek, who runs from the angry group that
had, just moments earlier, been proclaiming him a hero for having killed the
would-be burglars.
     When Daniel catches up with him, we're treated to some more flashbacks
that attempt to more fully explain Derek's change of heart. Turns out,
unsurprisingly, that he wasn't as big a hit in the slammer as he had been with
the groups he used to cheer into frenzied race-motivated attacks by simply
standing on his soapbox and being the rhetorical ringmaster to a bunch of
misguided teens. He was a recruiter and did Cameron's dirty work, something he
didn't realize until his stint in jail, during which he was raped and became
close friends with his secret protector, Lamont (played terrifically by Guy
Torry). All of this opened up his eyes, and he turned to Sweeney, who had once
been a man he greatly respected, for help.
     When Derek is through telling Daniel about what 'changed' him, the flaws
in the story become more noticeable, mainly because Daniel is so willing to
accepting of Derek's reasons, and himself reforms. The next morning, Derek has
an appointment with his parole officer, and is eager to get his life back on
track by obtaining his old job position, and he stops with Daniel, who is on
his way to school, to get a cup of coffee. Sweeney and a police officer show
up, in need of Derek's help. Cameron had been beaten badly the night before,
and they need Derek to get to the bottom of things. Derek reluctantly agrees,
telling Sweeney, "You're going to get me killed by a bunch of white boys."
     Foreshadowing has been evident up to this point, with Derek looking a bit
ill at ease before he even entered the coffee shop. But as he sees Daniel off
in front of the school building, the impending sense of doom is palpable. If
this synopsis seems short, let me assure you that it basically covers the
entire film, except for a short incident at the beginning that is pertinent to
the ending, I left it out because it would definitely be a spoiler. Even so,
considering the running time not very much happens. The 'present-time' actions
occur in color and within a very short (24 hour) time frame, and the
flashbacks, tastefully done in black and white, span from Derek's high school
years to his final day in prison.
     Furlong is solid as Daniel, but it is the amazing performance of Norton
that keeps "American History X" from lapsing into a tired story. The biggest
fault of the script is that believable reason for what led to the racist views
and actions of the Vinyard boys is never explained. Instead, an ill-conceived
dinner table scene has their murdered father, Dennis (William Russ of TV's "Boy
Meets World") explain "affirmative black-tion" to Derek, who had just told the
family about Sweeney, a double Ph.D. holder and great teacher, who was having
the class read "Native Son." What Dennis said, and how Derek had been portrayed
as up to that point, don't come close to adding up to the hate Derek harbored
towards non-Aryans.
     Lacking motivation, the characters wouldn't be believable at all if not
for the acting. Furlong gives his Daniel a depth that, while really only
extending towards trust, admiration, but also residual pain from the horror of
what he witnessed his fallen-hero older brother do to the intruders on the
night of the murders. And Norton's often chilling performance provides one of
the scariest cinematic scenes in recent memory; that of Derek's look of triumph
as he is arrested after the killings. Additional cliched characters include
Stacey (Fairuza Balk), Derek's ex-girlfriend, Murray (Elliott Gould), the
teacher from the beginning and an ex-boyfriend of the equally cliched ill
Doris, and the liberal sister (Lien). The supporting cast does what they can
with their underdeveloped roles. D'Angelo, Brooks, Torry, and Suplee in
particular, but the real supporting standout is Stacy Keach as the disgustingly
cowardly bigot Cameron.
     The most frighteningly realistic aspect of the story is that, while it
never convinces us why the main character(s) joined the neo-Nazis, it is very
convincing in it's depiction of insecure teens who feel a need to belong, and
find that sense of belonging in unabashed hatred. Charismatic recruiter Derek
isn't the kind of Bible-thumping Grand Dragon that appears on cheap talk shows,
he is a poised, passionate, and fervently articulate and captivating speaker.
Even those who disagree with his ideas listen, though incredulously, and are,
like Murray in a flashback scene, still resigned to the fact that nothing can
be done about it.
     In spite of the lackluster script (which admittedly may have come across
as a bad story because of the editing. Unless the Kaye-approved version is over
released, that may never be known), "American History X" is an engrossing film
that deserves to be seen. After seeing this, I'm looking forward to seeing
future work of director Kaye, who first made a name for himself directing
commercials. He also served as cinematographer, with impressive results. Shots
that are alternately stylish and gritty add a realistic touch that is otherwise
only visible through the performance of Norton.
     Brought to DVD by the New Line folks, renowned for their excellent
Platinum Series, of which "American History X" is not a part, the disc is, as
expected, an excellent package. The picture quality, for both the color and
black and white sequences, is crisp and clear. Presented only in widescreen,
also enhanced for 16x9 (widescreen) televisions, and in it's original 1.85:1
aspect ratio, it is another great transfer from New Line. The sound is also
very good (5.1 Surround or Surround). The supplements include, beside the usual
interactive menus, three deleted scenes (two are about a minute or less and
fairly inconsequential, another scene which explains what happened to Cameron
runs about five minutes long), the original theatrical trailer (widescreen),
and biographies and filmographies of the cast and crew.
     Notes: Rated R for graphic brutal violence, pervasive language, nudity,
and sexuality.
     DVD Details: Snap case.  Widescreen (16x9 enhanced) featuring three
deleted scenes, the original theatrical trailer, and cast and crew biographies
and filmographies.
     The Verdict: "American History X" is a stirring drama, and marks the
beginning of a promising career on behalf of director Tony Kaye. The story is
uneven, but Edward Norton's brilliant portrayal of a young neo-Nazi who's time
in prison forces him to reevaluate where hatred has gotten him in life is
reason enough to view this film. For optimum picture and sound quality, the DVD
is very highly recommended.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Arsenic and Old Lace (1944)
     Directed by Frank Capra. Written by Julius J. and Philip G. Epstein.
Starring Cary Grant, with Raymond Massey, Peter Lorre, Priscilla Lane,
Josephine Hull, and Jean Adair. 1944, 120 min., Not Rated.
     Joseph Kesselring's stage play of "Arsenic and Old Lace" was so popular on
Broadway that the release of the film version was delayed for three years, as
it could not be released until the play had finished it's run. I have heard
that some dialogue had to be changed at the end of the movie to appease the
censors, which is a shame because the changed sentences would have been much
funnier if left alone. Luckily, the script is brilliant, the cast is great, and
the movie is often hilarious. Frank Capra's direction at times seems both
tedious and chaotic, ultimately making for a satisfying viewing experience.
     At the beginning of the film we're given a bit of information (that it is
Halloween, and the setting is Brooklyn) before our awkward introduction to
dramatic critic and newlywed Mortimer Brewster (Cary Grant). A quickie marriage
to preacher's daughter Elaine Harper (Priscilla Lane) after their courtship, to
the opposition of her father, who voices his concerns, unaware that his
daughter is getting married at this time, to Mortimer's aunts, Martha (Jean
Adair) and Abby (Josephine Hull). (He isn't convinced that Mortimer, who has a
public stance against marriage, writing books with names such as "Marriage: A
Fraud and a Failure" and "Mind Over Matrimony," is husband material.)
     Martha and Abby, according to a police officer who is showing their
neighborhood to a young officer, O'Hara (Jack Carson), who will be taking over
his beat, are very nice women. Despite the sign in front of their somewhat
ominous looking large house, advertising a room for rent, the officer says that
they don't really rent out the room, but instead feed and take care of their
guests before letting them leave with their spirits lifted a bit higher. If you
think this sounds a little too perfect, you're right.
     Mortimer and Elaine are preparing for their honeymoon, and before they
leave for Niagara Falls, he goes to visit his aunts while Elaine breaks it to
her father, who lives nearby. There, he discovers a body in a window seat, and
Martha and Abby offhandedly say they killed him, earnestly reporting that they
only do it to the lonely old men who stop by to rent a room, in order to help
the men find peace. They simply add a deadly poisonous mixture to the wine they
offer the prospective lodger, and after the men are buried in the cellar, hold
proper Christian services for them.
     Cousin Teddy (John Alexander), who thinks he is President Theodore
Roosevelt, and runs upstairs, yelling "Charge" (as he believes the stairs are
San Juan Hill), assists. Martha and Abby get him to bury them in the cellar
(which be thinks is the Panama Canal) by telling him that they are yellow fever
victims. Mortimer is mortified. Teddy wasn't supposed to be put in a sanitarium
until Martha and Abby died, but now Mortimer is convinced that Teddy must
leave, and he rushes off to have a judge sign the papers to get him committed.
     While he is gone, his creepy, long-absent brother, Jonathan (Raymond
Massey), who looks like Boris Karloff, which is noted by several characters
(Karloff played the role of Jonathan in the play), arrives with his weird
plastic surgeon, Dr. Einstein (Peter Lorre) and scares his aunts. Jonathan's
face is scarred because Einstein was drunk the last time he operated. Though
the men are very secretive, and not much is revealed as to what they're really
involved in, they are on the run from the authorities and have brought a dead
body with them. Elaine comes over, trying to find Mortimer, who had been acting
weird ever since he discovered the body (which she doesn't know about), and
Jonathan thinks that she knows what he and Einstein are doing (they just
brought the body inside, after turning off all of the lights in the house and
making Martha and Abby go upstairs). Naturally, the aunts come downstairs at
the commotion and Mortimer comes back, and from here on out, all of the
storylines collide and the building pace of the movie really picks up speed and
becomes frantic.
     Officer O'Hara returns to make sure everything is okay, and is about to
leave when he realizes that Mortimer, being a respected drama critic, could
help him out. O'Hara has ideas for a play, and wants to discuss them with
Mortimer, who agrees, so that O'Hara will stay in the house. Before he joins
O'Hara in the kitchen, he tells Jonathan that he must leave. However, Jonathan
has different plans, and tells Einstein that the house will make a perfect
front for criminal operations.
     When Jonathan and Dr. Einstein find out that the bodies in the cellar were
victims of Abby and Martha, they are shocked. Einstein takes delight in
pointing out that Jonathan has only killed as many people as them. During the
next few scenes, O'Hara leaves, a doctor arrives to evaluate Teddy in order to
commit him, and Mortimer briefly catches up with Elaine. Back at the house,
Jonathan has bound Mortimer to a chair, and put a gag in his mouth, and O'Hara
arrives again because the neighbors have been complaining about the bugle Teddy
frequently blows. O'Hara doesn't bother untying Mortimer; instead he keeps him
stuck in the chair so that he can explain his play concept. Two other officers
arrive, and it still takes a considerable amount of time for the film to end. I
won't say any more, because the conclusion is the kind you must see to believe.
     Clocking in at almost two hours, a lot of story is packed into the film,
and the madcap events that ensue after the arrival of the police offers lead up
to an equally hectic, breathless ending. The acting, especially Jean Adair,
Josephine Hull, and John Alexander as Martha, Abby, and Teddy, respectively, is
excellent (all three of those actors were reprising their roles from the play).
Raymond Massey is effective as the Frankenstein-like Jonathan, Peter Lorre, who
played a lot of roles like this, is also very good. Priscilla Lane makes what
she can out of the underdeveloped character of Elaine.
     Cary Grant's performance is somewhat baffling. I've read criticism of the
overacting, and I've heard that he considered this the least favorite of all of
his movies for that reason. I will not disagree that he overacts, but it should
also be pointed out that the story is about a sane man who is driven to the
brink of insanity by his crazy relatives. Yes, even the killers in the movie
seem calm in comparison to Mortimer, but I think that explains his behavior. He
finds it incomprehensible that these people can be so laid back and
matter-of-fact about their homicidal hobbies.
     Mortimer is at his most dislikable at the beginning of the movie, but
gradually it is easy to realize why he is so, in the eyes of those around him,
excitable. As he wryly comments to Elaine, "Insanity runs in my family. It
practically gallops." The script is filled with one-liners, but the verbal
confusion, involving yelling and character's talking over one another is much
better pulled off in films like "His Girl Friday." And it is odd that Grant
seems a bit out of place in "Arsenic and Old Lace," as he has done superlative
work in classic films that belong to the genre's this particular movie tries to
blend. The story is great, and it is an overall great effort, but the film's
greatest fault is the manic behavior of Mortimer.
     Notes: This film has not been released on DVD. The video is available in
its original black and white version, or colorized. Not Rated, suitable for
family viewing.
     The Verdict: "Arsenic and Old Lace," is a great black comedy, featuring a
hilarious script and delightful performances by Hull, Adair, and Alexander. 
Recommended viewing.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
     Directed by Anthony Drazan.  Written by David Rabe.  Starring Sean Penn
and Kevin Spacey, with Chazz Palminteri and Robin Wright Penn.  1998, 123 min.,
Rated R.
     The night before I watched "Hurlyburly," I watched Neil LaBute's "Your
Friends & Neighbors."  Both films share the common theme of disparity in the
lives of people who seemingly have it all going for them.  "Hurlyburly,"
directed by Anthony Drazan is about the self-absorption of a group of friends
and acquaintances.  Unlike the characters in "Your Friends & Neighbors," the
folks here hurt themselves and each other through drug use and words instead of
sex.
     Eddie (Sean Penn) is a casting director who lives in a Hollywood Hills
mansion with business partner Mickey (Kevin Spacey).  A brief but concise
introduction into Eddie's world opens the film.  Introduced as occurring "A
Little While Ago" (only to skip ahead a short while later), Eddie snorts
cocaine and nervously paces the room, and says "Heart's stopped.  I know how
you feel," as a picture of open heart surgery flashes across the television
screen.  At this time nothing more about the character and how he will behave
throughout the rest of the movie has to be explained or foreshadowed; there is
an almost instantaneous identification with the inner pain this man is in,
which so obviously contorts him, that just makes you feel like nothing will
really change, at least during the course of the next couple of hours we'll
spend with him, because he needs this distress in order to function the only
way he knows how.
     To say that there is plot, and then discuss it is not something that would
be enjoyable to read because the movie is basically one hundred percent
dialogue and is largely repetitive.  Adapted by David Rabe from his own play,
it is easy to imagine the script as one rather length soliloquy, as characters,
mostly Eddie, deliver rambling, occasionally incoherent speeches at such a rate
that there is little time for pause or action of any sort.  Some viewers will
be turned off by this, but these are characters who feel like they are drowning
in themselves figuratively as they literally drown themselves in drugs.  I
didn't mind that a lot of the same things were mentioned in different ways by
the characters, whose few tangible bonds are their shared feelings of
suffocating in their own thoughts, their own selfishness and constant
distraction.  Everything revolves around them, and they don't know whether or
not it is okay to feel like that, even though they do.  It is what makes them
human, and it is what made it a sometimes visceral viewing experience for
myself.  
     The elements of the story that aren't exactly cohesive but band together
characters and lead into the ending are as follows: Eddie is interested in
Darlene (Robin Wright Penn), who is also in show business, but Mickey becomes
involved with her first.  Friend Artie (Garry Shandling) shows up at Eddie and
Mickey's place with Donna (Anna Paquin), a teen runaway (?) who was living in
the elevator at his building.  He "gives" her to them as a CARE package, and
Mickey finds her more interesting a prospect than Darlene, so tries to pull the
noble friend routine by encouraging Eddie and Darlene to give a go at a
relationship.  Phil (Chazz Palminteri), Eddie's struggling actor friend and
small-time thug, is having marital woes and spends much of his free time
getting high, popping pills, and intimidating Donna at the Hills bachelor pad. 
     Along for the ride is Bonnie (Meg Ryan), infamous in Eddie and Mickey's
circle for her promiscuity, who is tossed out of a moving car by Phil, after
Eddie tried to set the two of them up towards the end of a night of mucho
chemical (plural and of various natures) intake.  Bonnie is the most
out-of-place character, though Ryan makes a nice impression during her brief
on-camera stint.  The only reason necessitating even the mentioning of her
character is a story that the sober but soon not to be Eddie tells about Bonnie
engaging in what can definitely be considered bad-parenting behavior around her
young daughter, at the suggestion of Eddie and Mickey, who doesn't show any
emotion as Eddie disgustedly keeps on with the story.
     "Hurlyburly" boasts perhaps the best ensemble acting of 1998.  Penn is
astounding, and Spacey is perfect, and appears to revel in the sarcastic,
hypocritical lines Mickey gets to slyly deliver.  Robin Wright Penn, Shandling,
and Paquin don't have too much to do, but are solid in their roles, and
Palminteri is also great.  Drazan has a visual style that is mostly
uncluttered, which works well because the dialogue is the main attraction. 
Rabe has crafted a script that will be irritating and stilted, just adequate,
or revelatory depending on the viewer.  Some of the plot is strained, and about
an hour and a half into the film I knew what the "big event" would be that
would give some of the characters a chance for redemption, and I also knew how
they'd use that chance.  Predictable, but interesting to watch unfold.  
     DVD Details: New Line unfortunately didn't release the DVD as a part of
their Platinum Series, but it is nonetheless an affordably priced ($24.99,
available online for $14.99) disc with an attractively sparse look and some
good supplemental material.  Shown widescreen (the film's aspect ratio is
1.85:1) and anamorphically enhanced, the picture is mostly solid but at times
artifacts are noticeable.  Anything less than absolute visual brilliance is
considered substandard for a New Line DVD release, but the picture quality is
acceptable and quite good.  The sound is excellent.  Stereo surround and DD
5.1, in a movie that is entirely composed of dialogue, it more than suffices
and everything sounds crisp and clear.
     The main menu is simple and nice looking, with Play Movie, Special
Features, Scene Selections, and Language Selections options.  If you click on
the New Line logo you'll see disc production credits.  The theatrical trailer
is slightly grainy at times, gives the definition of the film's title, "n. 1.
Tumultuous commotion; uproar."  Cast and crew filmographies and biographies are
included, as are two full-length audio commentaries.  The first is with
director Drazan; he rhapsodizes on directing the adaptation, and David Rabe on
the writing process.  The second track is of Penn, Rabe, and author/social
commentator Janet Brown discussing the themes in the play and movie, and
selective music cues and insight from composer David Baerwald.  It isn't an "As
Good As It Gets" or "Bound" type of together-in-a-room discussion, rather
isolated comments with some stretches of just the movie in between.  Overall,
the second commentary track is interesting and informative.  
     Notes: Rated R for constant drug use, pervasive language, and some sexual
material.  I read a review saying this film isn't appropriate (in that
reviewer's opinion) for anyone under college age, but as a high school student
I can say that most mature teenagers can 'handle' seeing this movie.  
     The Verdict: "Hurlyburly" isn't for everyone.  It's story is hidden under
layer upon layer of dialogue, but it's lasting message and the excellent acting
are it's strongest suits and fans of dark, offbeat, edgy dramas with a healthy
dose of social commentary are most likely to appreciate it.  And the DVD is
another New Line home-run.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
     Directed by Robert Rodriguez.  Written by Kevin Williamson.  Starring
Jordana Brewster, Clea DuVall, Laura Harris, Josh Hartnett, Shawn Hatosy and
Elijah Wood.  1998, 104 min., Rated R.
     Because of the usual critical overreaction that accompanies the release of
many American films that are intended to be no more than an hour and a half
long popcorn-filled break from reality, "The Faculty" was panned by most.  And
I went into this viewing experience not expecting much.  After all, director
Robert Rodriguez went from "El Mariachi" to "Desperado" and Kevin "Scream"
Williamson's scripts become tediously self-referential.  The theatrical trailer
boasted the previous projects of director and screenwriter more than it did the
actual movie.  Even the Tommy Hilfiger ad campaign, which would make one
believe that R&B star Usher was the main attraction of "The Faculty," quickly
wore out their welcome.  How did my opinion change after actually seeing it? 
You may be as surprised as I was.
     Lacking the satirical edge that fueled both "Scream" entries; "The
Faculty" manages to be a parody instead, not entirely with success.  "The
Breakfast Club," "Alien," "The Thing," and "The Invasion of the Body Snatchers"
are all evident influences.  More than influences, they provide the plot and
familiar characters.  Herrington High used to be a typical school in Ohio.  But
lately the teachers have been acting strange, and six seemingly mismatched
teens will have to tolerate one another in order to save the day.  Delilah
(Jordana Brewster) is the head cheerleader and editor of the school paper who
is dating Stan (Shawn Hatosy), the star quarterback who is sick of getting
preferential treatment because of his place on the social hierarchy.  He worked
hard for the D he got on that science test.  How dare Mr. Furlong (Jon Stewart,
host of "The Daily Show") give him a higher grade for having a golden arm that
has led to the team having a great season?  
     Zeke (Josh Hartnett, "Halloween: H20") is the bad boy.  His parents are
gone, possibly to Europe, and as he repeats his senior year he sells homemade
drugs, fake IDs, and video tapes featuring full frontal nudity of Neve Campbell
and Jennifer Love Hewitt (stars respectively of "Scream" and "I Know What You
Did Last Summer," another Williamson script) out of his trunk in the school
parking lot.  Rounding out the group are the new girl, Marybeth of Atlanta
(Laura Harris), geeky, much harassed photographer Casey (Elijah Wood, the
veteran of the young cast), and Stokely (Clea DuVall, in a standout
performance), the sci-fi reading, darkly dressed outcast whose ambiguity leads
Delilah to fire off several homophobic insults.
     The faculty itself, consisting of Nurse Harper (Salma Hayek in her
obligatory appearance in a Rodriguez film) who's saving her sick days for when
she feels better; Miss Burke (Famke Janssen), a bookish teacher who transforms
into a sexpot and who has a very funny scene with Zeke; Mrs. Olson (Piper
Laurie, who was spooky in "Carrie" and "Twin Peaks"); Principal Drake (Bebe
Neuwirth, in a nod to Lillith and her "Cheers" days); Mr. Furlong; and steely
Coach Willis (Robert Patrick, from "T2: Judgement Day") is bent on making the
town pod people.  
     As the six students race to find out who the "Queen" of the pod people is
in order to prevent disaster, they begin doubting each other, and with good
reason.  Fast pacing, dialogue that is at times surprisingly lame, and hokey
special effects add to the jovial atmosphere.  Particularly amusing are the
insults Stokely throws around and Summer Phoenix as a girl who is always
yelling profanities at and hitting her boyfriend.  It's not quite campy; it's a
bit more serious than that.  "The Faculty" is, however, entertaining, a
throwback to the era in cinema history when cheesy sci-fi stories were viewed
at drive-in theaters by teenagers on the weekend.  A grade A B movie,
recommended.  

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Directed by James L. Brooks. Written by Brooks and Mark Andrus. Starring
Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, and Greg Kinnear, with Cuba Gooding, Jr. 1997, 139
min., Rated PG-13.
There were moments during "As Good As It Gets" during which I knew that
the film had the potential to live up to its title. Admittedly, the script is
among the most sharply written of the 1990s, and probably the best script of
1997. But the movie was longer than it should have been, and awkwardly overly
sentimental at times, among other things.
Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson) is an obsessive-compulsive romance novelist
whose greatest character fault is his bigotry and abrasive personality, most
notably his tendency to become verbally abusive towards everyone with whom he
crosses paths. A crucial part of his routine is dining at the restaurant where
waitress Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) serves him. He brings his own plastic
eating utensils, and is gruff towards other patrons, employees, and even Carol,
but he is also interested in her.
Carol has difficulties of her own, including the severe asthma that
plagues her young son, Spence. She is a single mother, raising Spence in an
apartment with her mother  Beverly (Shirley Knight), who is unhappy with
Carol's unhappiness. "As Good As It Gets" follows the progression of the
Melvin/Carol relationship, throwing into the mix Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear),
an artist who lives in the apartment neighboring Melvin's.
Simon is gay, which Melvin makes a point of demeaning, and Simon has a
dog, Verdell, who Melvin makes a point of hating (and dumping down garbage
chutes). After walking in on a group of young men, the friends of a street
hustler (Skeet Ulrich) he has been painting, robbing him, Simon is severely
beaten. During his recuperation, Melvin is forced into caring for Verdell, at
the behest of Simon's protective art dealer (Cuba Gooding, Jr.). Man and man's
best friend bond, as will eventually Melvin and Simon.
As he begins to recover, Simon, emotionally and physically drained,
arrives at the conclusion that he should visit his parent's in an attempt to
mend fences with the father who has disowned him, and the mother who stands
idly by her husband, although she disagrees with him. Oh, yeah, Simon is also
going to ask them for money. Melvin is given the great distinction of serving
as chauffeur, and asks Carol to join the expedition. She accepts, partly
because she is intrigued by Melvin, and partly out of silent obligation. He is,
after all, paying for Spence to receive the medical care that Carol and her
mother could only dream of before. (He says he is doing it because he needs
Carol to be at work so she can cook for him.)
The road trip provides the chance for everyone to get to know each other
better, but by the time they're on their way back home, "As Good As It Gets"
has run out of steam. There is one ending too many, mainly the Melvin/Carol
resolutions that are basically re-treading previous encounters, you'll be
thinking to yourself "This seems awfully familiar," because the same things
have happened in different settings several times already.
James L. Brooks, who has directed such contemporary classics as "Terms of
Endearment" and "Broadcast News," has a style all his own that is easy to
recognize, and is in full-form here. The often-sparkling script, courtesy of
Mark Andrus and Brooks, is brought vividly to life in three of the best
performances of 1997. Nicholson is completely convincing as Melvin, and Hunt is
able to display the full range of her talents, which until recently were partly
showcased weekly as a mostly comedic actress on NBC's "Mad About You." If you
thought she was good in "Mad About You," wait till you see her in this. Greg
Kinnear, whom I best remember as the host of the hilarious cable show "Talk
Soup", gives a wonderfully nuanced turn as Simon. The supporting players,
including Cuba Gooding, Jr., Skeet Ulrich, Shirley Knight, and Yeardley Smith
(voice of Lisa on "The Simpsons") are all great.
"As Good As It Gets" is not as good as it gets, but is fitfully within
reach of being so. Nicholson and Hunt's Oscar-winning performances (Kinnear was
nominated for Supporting Actor) and an often daring and darkly comic script are
some of the better things "As Good As It Gets" has to offer, and the only real
disappointments are the repetitive incidents and anti-climactic ending (as was
the case in "Broadcast News").
Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Dial M for Murder (1954)
     Directed by Alfred Hitchcock.  Written by Frederick Knott.  Starring Grace
Kelly, Ray Milland, and Robert Cummings.  1954, 107 min., Not Rated.
     Of the three films Grace Kelly starred in that were directed by Alfred
Hitchcock, "Dial M for Murder" is the most bizarre.  Tony Wendice (Ray Milland)
is a former tennis player who is married to wealthy Margot (Kelly), who only
has eyes for Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings), a mystery novelist.  Tony knows
about their long-distance affair, carried on primarily through written
correspondence, as Mark lives in America and the Wendice's in England, and Tony
is also in need of Margot's money.  For quite some time he has been planning
what he thinks will be the perfect crime, but his plans go awry and Margot ends
up accused of murder.
     The plot is not what distinguishes "Dial M for Murder" from the
suspense-filled exercise in identified voyeurism that is "Rear Window," or the
stylized romantic mystery "To Catch a Thief," (1954 and 1955, respectively). 
The script, written by Frederick Knott from his own hit play, has an unusually
detached atmosphere.  We see what is happening, but are never given a reason to
care one way or another.  The ending is never in doubt, and the three principal
characters have no redeeming qualities.  Yet there is a precision to the
dialogue that makes it all highly engrossing.  
     Hitchcock's signature cameo comes in the form of his appearance on a
picture taken at Tony's class reunion, there was little opportunity for him to
appear on the streets or what not, as the camera rarely ventures outdoors, and
when it does it is never for very long.  In addition to the expected
interesting shots, there is a wonderful sequence in which the events of
Margot's trial are not shown; we hear some of the things that were said but all
that is visible in Margot's reaction.  It should also be noted that the clothes
she wears become darker throughout the course of the movie, a nice symbolic
touch.  Kelly and Milland give great performances; Cummings does not fare so
well.  His acting is unnatural and the role of Mark would have benefited from
better casting.  With Anthony Dawson (as Lesgate) and John Williams
(outstanding as Chief Inspector Hubbard). Cinematography by Robert Burks.     

Title
Review for Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss (1998)
Written and Directed by Tommy O'Haver. Starring Sean P. Hayes, with Brad Rowe,
Richard Ganoung, Paul Bartel, and Meredith Scott Lynn. 1998, 92 min., Rated R.
     Billy Collier (Sean P. Hayes, now stealing scenes as Jack on NBC's "Will &
Grace") is a struggling photographer and hopeless romantic. As if that wasn't
bad enough for a young person in the 90s, Billy has fallen for coffeehouse
waiter Gabriel (Brad Rowe), and he doesn't know whether or not Gabriel is gay.
Apparently, Gabriel doesn't know either. The two become friends, and Gabriel
works as a model for the new series Billy is shooting (re-creating famous
Hollywood screen kisses-such as that famous roll on the beach in "From Here to
Eternity"-using Gabriel and a drag queen). As the friendship progresses and
Billy becomes more intent on finding out where he stands with Gabriel, a
somewhat needless journey provides an opportunity for Billy and his close
friend, Georgiana (Meredith Scott Lynn) to escape to an exotic location where
they both do some soul searching.
     "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" is a predictable movie, but it is well
acted. Hayes, Rowe, and Lynn are all appealing in the three largest roles, and
this is a promising effort from writer and director Tommy O'Haver (this marks
his feature film debut). Billy's black and white fantasies (about his Hollywood
screen kiss) and the clever Polaroid flashbacks are nice touches that
distinguish the movie from other romantic comedies. The DVD is presented in
widescreen format, and the picture is crisp and clear. The 2.0 Dolby Surround
Sound works well for this film, which is mostly dialogue. There aren't many
supplementary features, just the theatrical trailer and commentary from O'Haver
(I would have liked to have heard commentary from the actors, as well) in
addition to the standard interactive menus, scene access, and subtitles. Fans
of the film will definitely want the DVD, as the video is still priced for the
rental market.
     Notes: Rated R for language, and brief scenes involving sexuality and drug
use.
     DVD Details: Keep case (disc holder on left side), widescreen, 2.0 Dolby
Surround Sound, Digitally mastered, Interactive menus, Scene access, Theatrical
Trailer, French and Spanish subtitles, Director commentary.
     The Verdict: "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" is a breezy comedy with an
intelligent, mostly light-hearted script and good performances that will please
open-minded audiences that don't mind a predictable story.
    Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert, The (1994)
"The Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert"
     Written and Directed by Stephan Elliott.  Starring Terence Stamp, Hugo
Weaving, and Guy Pearce, with Bill Hunter.  1994, 102 min., Rated R.
     The premise of "The Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert," is
simple.  In fact, the whole movie is rather simplistic, it is a buddy/road
comedy with a twist, being that two of the three main characters are female
impersonators, and the third is an transsexual who was once at the top of her
profession in a revue called Les Girls.  Tick, also known as Mitzi (Hugo
Weaving) opens the film with a performance at a bar, lip-synching to "I've
Never Been to Me."  He sells Wo-Man cosmetics on the side, and when he is
extended the opportunity to perform at a casino in Alice Springs, he calls upon
his friends Adam (a.k.a. Felicia, played by Guy Pearce, best known as Ed Exley
in "L.A. Confidential") and Bernadette (Terence Stamp) to join him.  
     They hit the road from Sydney, Australia, in a bus christened Priscilla,
Queen of the Desert, and run into many problems, personally and otherwise, as
they make their way to Alice Springs.  Their emotional baggage includes Tick's
heretofore big secret that he is married and has a child (surprise, surprise,
his wife is a lesbian), Adam's troubled childhood and dealing with his mother's
reaction to his sexuality, and Bernadette's struggle with a mid-life crisis. 
Along the way they encounter bigotry and the beginnings of resolutions to their
own problems, which, in Bernadette's case, comes in the form of Bob (Bill
Hunter), a mechanic who climbs aboard Priscilla for the last leg of the journey
to Alice Springs after being humiliated and dumped by his wife, and who becomes
quietly interested in Bernadette.
     "The Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert," is an enjoyable comedy
with a few problems.  The stereotypical, one-dimensional bigots are overused,
and some may be upset at the missed opportunities to go beneath the gaudy
exteriors of our protagonists, but while that would have been an interesting
angle, it would also have been a completely different movie, and I liked this
one as it was.  The retro-infused soundtrack features disco favorites and
older, campy fluff.   On-stage performances, confidently pulled off by the trio
of lead actors with great charisma, decked out in amazing costumes (which won
the 1994 Oscar for Best Achievement in Costume Design--Lizzy Gardiner and Tim
Chappel), are Priscilla's strongest suit.  
     Weaving, Pearce, and Stamp work well together, and all turn in solid
performances.  Weaving doesn't have to show much emotion until the end, when
dealing with having to be a father to his son, and Pearce, who most recently
starred in "Ravenous," is showcased in Priscilla as extremely versatile; he was
by far the most believable in his portrayal of a drag queen.  Stamp doesn't
make a particularly lovely lady, but has some of the most emotional scenes in
the film, which he handles with a subtle dignity that makes him stand out.  The
script is spiked with profanity and funny barbs shot from character to
character, but is occasionally slow-moving.  A sample of the one-liners: The
introduction of a dog named Herpes ("If she's good she'll heal") and Felicia
asking a video store clerk "Do you have the  Texas Chainsaw Mascara?"  Stephan
Elliott, who wrote it, is also a competent director.
     DVD Details: A PolyGram release.  Standard and widescreen versions are
both available on the disc, with the widescreen version presenting the film in
it's original 2.35:1.  The transfer is almost flawless, the most minute details
of the intricate costumes and scenic Outback setting are visible.  The sound,
DD 2.0, is equally impressive; the fun soundtrack is crisp and clear.  There is
little in the way of extras, composed mainly of the original theatrical
trailer, a teaser trailer, and biography/filmographies of the cast and
filmmakers.  A PolyGram DVD sampler, and trailers for "When We Were Kings,"
"The Portrait of a Lady" and "Fargo."  There is French dubbing and Spanish
subtitles, additionally.  Interactive menus and scene selection.  
     Notes: Available on video and DVD.  The DVD will be discontinued as of
June 30th, 1999, so if you want it get it while you can.  Rated R for
profanity, sexual situations, and adult situations.
     The Verdict: Entertaining blend of comedy and drama, highlighted with
terrific acting and must-see musical numbers, "The Adventures of Priscilla,
Queen of the Desert" is an often hilarious road trip that will please viewers
who like offbeat films with mainstream themes.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Fried Green Tomatoes (1991)
     Directed by Jon Avnet.  Written by Fannie Flagg, Carol Sobieski, and Jon
Avnet.  Starring Mary Stuart Masterson, Mary-Louise Parker, Kathy Bates, and
Jessica Tandy.  1991, 137 min., Not Rated (See below for details).
     Just to kick this review off, I think this is pertinent info: "Fried Green
Tomatoes" is not a chick flick.  I generally consider so-called chick flicks to
be fluff like "At First Sight."  No, wait, "At First Sight" is just a bad
movie.  Chick flicks are melodramatic tearjerkers that claim to be about
empowerment, you know, that sort of thing.  Movies of the week, and most of
Lifetime TVs movie programming comes to mind.  But "Fried Green Tomatoes" is
just solid entertainment: a good story told by talented artists who have a
visible love for their work.  That is evident not only in the actual movie, but
in the making-of documentary included on the DVD.
     The story, of course, derived from the Fannie Flagg Pulitzer Prize
nominated "Fried Green Tomatoes at the Whistle Stop Café."  Ninny Threadgoode
(Jessica Tandy) is an elderly woman in a retirement home whom befriends Evelyn
Couch (Kathy Bates), a middle-aged woman who is unsatisfied with her life. 
With Evelyn, Ninny shares stories about the remarkable friendship between two
women in the 1920s, Idgie Threadgoode and Ruth Jamison, whose lives were
intertwined by tragedy, and who formed a bond that nothing could put a dent in.
 Several versions of the script were worked on by several people.  Carol
Sobieski was brought in originally, Flagg worked on the screenplay for a while,
and then Avnet himself completed it and revised it several times before Flagg
came aboard again.  The finished product was nominated for an Academy Award for
Best Screenplay (adaptation, the only other Oscar nomination was that of Best
Supporting Actress, which Tandy was up for) and film characters that are just
as unforgettable as those in the novel.
     Idgie Threadgoode is a female Huck Finn.  She is a tomboy, something that
her older sister Leona finds embarrassing and that older brother Julian finds
taunt-worthy.  Her best friend is her older brother, Buddy (played by Chris
O'Donnell).  Buddy is a young man trying to romance Ruth (Mary-Louise Parker),
and Idgie tags along as they go for a walk one afternoon.  Buddy, as he tries
to retrieve Ruth's hat, which had flown away and onto train tracks, finds
himself unable to free his foot from the tracks.  He is killed, and Idgie
isolates herself from everyone and everything.
     By the time Idgie is in her late teens and still in self-imposed exile,
her mother brings Ruth back to intervene, as she will be in Whistle Stop for
the summer.  They slowly form a friendship that is fueled by their differences.
 After a fun-filled night of birthday celebration that Idgie had planned for
Ruth, Ruth announces that she is going to be married to a man named Frank
Bennett once the summer is over.  Idgie is crushed and again isolates herself. 
But eventually she can no longer take it, and goes to see Ruth.  A chain of
events (that no one realizes will have the impact it eventually does) occurs
that brings Ruth back to Whistle Stop, where her and Idgie live in a domestic
bliss of sorts, running the Whistle Stop Café.
     From this point forward, as Evelyn gains strength from her newfound
self-confidence, supplied by her friendship with Ninny and the stories of Idgie
and Ruth, the 30s story focuses on the mysterious disappearance of Frank
Bennett.  As was the case when I read the book for the first time, I like the
Idgie/Ruth stories more than I like the Ninny/Evelyn stories.  But it is in the
characterization of the relationship between Idgie and Ruth that the movie most
differs from the book.  The book made things fairly obvious that Idgie and Ruth
were more than friends, or at least shared the mutual feelings of attraction. 
The script's timeline isn't in accordance with that of the book, and overtones
have been subdued in many places because of that.  But director and
co-screenwriter Jon Avnet didn't totally shy away from the subject.  
     There are several scenes that weren't in the book that, for the most part,
served as the hints to the true nature of their relationship.  So while I
wished the movie had been more loyal to the book, I have to give Avnet props
for what he managed to work in.  A part of the book that did remain in the
movie, and is basically the core of the story, is that Idgie and Ruth were
daring in their time for a social reason differing from that just discussed:
They employed Sipsey and Big George, and spent most of their time with them. 
The white folks in town didn't especially appreciate that, as they thought
Sipsey and Big George didn't qualify as good company because of the color of
their skin.  Ruth and Idgie don't care, and against the warnings of Idgie's
friend and once hopeful suitor (who made halfhearted passes at her before
marrying someone else) serve food to black people, and care for and clean up
Smokey Lonesome, an alcoholic drifter.  
     When released in 1992, "Fried Green Tomatoes" was a surprise success at
the box-office.  I didn't see it then, but rather a few years later when it was
first shown on network television (I must have been between ten and twelve
years old), and even then I didn't pay much attention to it.  The only memories
of the film that I carried with me for the next few years were those of Evelyn
repeatedly backing up and slamming into the car of the young women in a parking
lot, and her greeting her husband, Ed, at the front door in a Saran-Wrap, well,
a Saran-Wrap wrap.  About a year ago I caught part of the movie on cable, and
liked it enough that I couldn't wait to see it again in it's entirety.  And
once I owned the DVD, I found that I frequently wanted to watch it again,
because I was so fond of the characters.  
     The only real weaknesses are the scenes that are aimed towards a bit more
than melodrama; trying to jerk tears is one step too far, and attempts to do so
are needless.  And it begins to strain willingness to accept stories that try
too hard to show the parallels between Evelyn's situation and the events in
Whistle Stop.  The story element that bothered me the most was that towards the
end of the movie there is a suggestion that Ninny and Idgie are the same
person, and I didn't like that, as I thought it was rather clear in the book
that they are two different people.  
     Evelyn Couch is a great character, and Kathy Bates is the only actress
that I think could pull off the role, and she did so wonderfully.  As a matter
of fact, all of the four actresses were first-rate choices.  Jessica Tandy
brings an effervescence to Ninny that deservedly won her an Oscar nomination
for Best Supporting Actress.  Mary Stuart Masterson had the mannerisms and
attitude, accent and all, down pat, and Mary-Louise Parker was given the
long-deserved chance to show her talent with her portrayal of complicated Ruth.
 Both Bates & Tandy and Masterson & Parker have great chemistry that made their
respective scenes together magic.  
     The supporting cast is just as impressive.  Cicely Tyson (Sipsey), Stan
Shaw (Big George),  Gary Basaraba (Grady Kilgore), Nick Searcy (Frank Bennett),
Raynor Scheiner (Curtis Smoote) and Tim Scott (Smokey Lonesome) all lend
believability to their characters.  Director Jon Avnet did a wonderful job on
this, his first feature film, and I give him and Sobieski and Flagg much credit
for crafting such a great story.  It is one of the rare stories that has it
all: happiness, sadness, friendship, romance, death, mystery, laughter, tears;
a celebration of life and regular people.  As Sipsey and Ninny would say, "The
secret's in the sauce."  
     DVD Details: A Universal Collector's Edition.  Presented in it's original
theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1; anamorphically enhanced.  The transfer is
terrific, the colors are rich and without flaw.  The soundtrack is presented in
DD 2.0, which suffices, seeing as the film is mostly dialogue.  Trains, glass
shattering, and the lively, atmospheric score all sound great.  The running
commentary of director Jon Avnet,  is informative and elaborates on many of the
things he brought up in "Moments of Discovery," an hour long documentary about
the making of the film.  It features interviews with Avnet, the stars and
support cast members, the composer, author Fannie Flagg, various producers and
the production designer.  Their obvious enthusiasm over the film and their
co-workers is refreshing.  The documentary is entertaining, and features a tour
of the Whistle Stop Café and the town surrounding it, as well as what happened
to that town after the movie became a surprise hit.  It should be noted that
this was made years after the completion of the film, I believe specifically
for the DVD.  Other supplements include production notes, interactive menus,
scene access, French and Spanish subtitles, English captions for the hearing
impaired, cast and filmmaker filmographies and biographies, Jon Avnet's scene
specific notes, production photographs, pictures of the posters used in the
advertising campaign, Sipsey's recipes, the original theatrical trailer and a
trailer for another of Avnet's projects, "The War."  Keepcase with production
booklet.
     Notes: Several video versions are available, with options including
clamshell case, widescreen format, and the extended version.  Originally rated
PG-13 for violence, adult themes (mostly just some tense scenes), and mild
language.  The extended version is seven minutes longer than the PG-13 cut, had
the film been re-submitted to the MPAA, the rating would stand.  
     The Verdict: It's not without minor fault, but give "Fried Green Tomatoes"
a chance.  Winning performances and great characters make this worth seeing,
and those who are left wanting more should definitely read the book.  For fans
of the film, the Universal Collector's Edition DVD is a must-have.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for All About Eve (1950)
     Written and Directed by Joseph L. Mankiewicz. Starring Bette Davis and
Anne Baxter, with George Sanders, Celeste Holm, and Gary Merrill. 1950, 138
min., Not Rated.
     In 1950, two movies about show business and the lives of aging stars were
released: Billy Wilder's "Sunset Boulevard" and Joseph L. Mankiewicz's "All
About Eve." Both were big successes, the latter being nominated for a record
fourteen Academy Awards (the record has been tied but never surpassed), and
winning six, including Best Picture, Best Director, and Best Writing. Widely
considered to be the film best capturing the world of theatre, it is thoroughly
entertaining, and is one of the best written, directed, and acted of all
American movies.
     The movie begins with a prestigious stage-acting award being presented to
young Eve Harrington (Anne Baxter). As an elderly man makes a speech prior to
handing her the award, we hear the commentary of theater critic Addison DeWitt
(George Sanders). He introduces us to the world he observes, and we are taken
back a few months in time, to before Eve was a star. Karen Richards (Celeste
Holm), wife of famous playwright Lloyd Richards (Hugh Marlowe), is making her
way to the theater one night as she begins thinking of the young woman she sees
waiting near the door every night.
     She is introduced to the woman, Eve Harrington, and learns that Eve has
watched every single performance of her husband's current success, the play
"Aged in Wood," because she is a great fan of it's star, Margo Channing (Bette
Davis). Karen decides to introduce Eve to Margo, who initially objects to
meeting the girl. Once Eve begins talking with Margo, Margo's suspicious
assistant, Birdie (Thelma Ritter), Lloyd and Karen, they become captivated with
her. She tells them of how she went to work at a beer company to help her poor
parents, and how depressing her existence was until she met a man named Eddie.
They married, and he went to fight in the war, and when he was killed she was
devastated. Seeing Margo perform the play in San Francisco lifted her spirits.
Since then, she has been a devoted supporter, and credits Margo and the magic
of the theater for giving her something to live for.
     Birdie quips, "What a story. Everything but the bloodhounds snapping at
her rear end." Margo admonishes her and the friends are humbled at the eager
kindness and sad past of Eve. Margo's boyfriend, theater director Bill Sampson
(Gary Merrill), arrives to take Margo to the airport with him, as he must board
a plane for Hollywood, where he is going to direct his first motion picture;
and Margo asks Eve to accompany them. Shortly thereafter, Eve becomes a fixture
in the lives of Margo, Birdie, Bill, and the Richards'. Birdie, who cleans up
after Margo, never seems to warm up to Eve, who begins assuming the
responsibilities of helping with Margo's career and relationship with Bill.
     Margo grows tired of Eve's attentiveness, and asks Birdie why she seems to
distrust Eve. Birdie explains that Eve seems to be studying Margo, as if she
were a blueprint. Margo notices the same thing, and, when Bill comes back and a
party is thrown at Margo's house in honor of his return and of his birthday,
she cannot stand it anymore. Before he comes up to say hello to her, he greets
and talks with Eve for twenty minutes. Margo, none too pleased, announces, in
one of the film's most famous quotes, "Fasten your seatbelts, it's going to be
a bumpy night."
     This is when the famous plot of "All About Eve" is realized. As the night
wears on, and much attention is paid to Eve, Margo gets drunk and acts rude.
Marilyn Monroe has a small part as Miss Claudia Caswell, the wannabe actress
that DeWitt brings as his date (with the ulterior motive of her getting to know
stage producer Max, played by Gregory Ratoff, as DeWitt finds out more about
Eve), and has several funny lines. When Margo gets Max alone, they begin
talking about a play he needs to cast, and she says that she will audition for
him if he can give Eve a job, as she no longer wants her around.
     As usual, Margo is late for the audition, and arrives to find DeWitt (with
Miss Caswell, who was there for the audition, also), who tells her that it is
over. Eve gave a terrific audition, and Lloyd, who had written the role
specifically with Margo in mind, thinks that Eve is perfect for the part. Margo
barges into the theater and confronts Lloyd, Max, and Bill. Eve disappears as
Margo begins shouting, and Lloyd and Max both eventually leave. Bill stays, and
Margo confesses that she is afraid of losing him, citing their age difference
(she is eight years older), and the ever-growing presence of Eve in their
lives, as her reasons. In a heated scene skillfully guided by Merrill and
Davis, Bill tells her that if that is how she feels, it is over, and leaves.
     Karen, who, at Eve's hesitant request, pulled some strings to get her a
position as Margo's understudy in Aged in Wood, decides to give Margo a dose of
her own medicine, and hatches a plan. Lloyd, Karen, and Margo go away for the
weekend, and they run out of gas on the way back. Margo misses the performance,
and Eve has the chance to flex her acting muscles. Of course, this was all
arranged so that critics would know to see that night's performance, and she
receives some nice press. Sort of.
     Before the next morning's papers go to press, Addison is lurking outside
of Eve's dressing room and hears her make a pass at Bill, who flatly turns her
down. Addison engages Eve in conversation, and the next afternoon, they run
into Karen, and tell her that Eve is about to meet with movie scouts. Addison
hands Karen the newspaper, and tells her to read his column. In it, Eve sounds
off, making references that she is better suited for the part than Margo, who
is too old to be playing a twenty-something.
     Karen goes to see Margo, who is furious and upset. Bill rushes in to
comfort Margo. Later, a reunited and engaged Bill and Margo go to dinner with
Karen and Lloyd, and Eve asks to see Karen in the ladies room. She tells her
that Addison DeWitt twisted her words, and acts very upset. As Karen's sympathy
for her grows, Eve asks for the role of Cora, which is supposed to belong to
Margo, in Lloyd's new play. Karen says no, and Eve blackmails her, telling her
that if she does not get the role, DeWitt will print a story revealing why
Margo missed the performance that gave Eve her chance at stardom.
     Luckily, Margo tells a nervous Karen, when she returns to the table, that
now that she is going to be a married woman she can't accept the role of Cora.
Eve is cast, and Bill is convinced to direct the play, although he does not
want to work with Eve. He and Lloyd fight a lot during rehearsals, and it is
clear that the production is taking its toll on everyone.
     Eve talks with DeWitt a few hours before opening night, and tells him that
Lloyd is leaving Karen for her. DeWitt is disgusted by her lie, and tells her
that even if something was going on between her and Lloyd, nothing could ever
come of it because she belongs to him. Naturally, he has dirt on her, and when
she is faced with his knowledge of her deceit (i.e., the false stories she told
everyone to gain their sympathy), she agrees to his terms. Finally, the movie
picks up where it began, with Eve accepting an award for her performance in the
play. After the ceremony, she goes back to her hotel room to find a young fan
inside, eager to meet her.
     The screenplay for "All About Eve," written by the film's director, Joseph
L. Mankiewicz (adapted from the Mary Orr play, "The Wisdom of Eve") is filled
with sparkling, snappy dialogue and the characters are richly developed.
Clocking in at about two hours and eighteen minutes, the film, surprisingly,
never seems to drag, moving from one situation to the next. The sophisticated
screenplay is vividly brought to life by one of the best ensemble casts ever
assembled.
     Bette Davis is in top form as Margo, an insecure star very aware of the
fact that her famous persona doesn't guarantee anything, and who sees her
popularity and career fading. Anne Baxter shines as Eve, Celeste Holm and Hugh
Marlowe are great as Karen and Lloyd, and Thelma Ritter is amusing as Birdie.
Gary Merrill and Davis (who were married that year) are excellent together, and
George Sanders gives a brilliant turn as the diabolical, omniscient DeWitt (for
which he won an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor).
     An interesting thing about this movie is that, though it is about the
theater, it mostly occurs off-stage. The story, about the conniving protégé,
has been imitated numerous times, but none have come close to capturing the
atmosphere of this script. Mankiewicz, besides penning an immortal screenplay
filled with many clever, sharp-witted lines (Margo tells Lloyd, "All
playwrights should be dead for three-hundred years"), has crafted a timeless
story and classic movie.
      The Verdict: "All About Eve" has all of the elements of a classic film in
spades. Terrific acting, direction, and a knowledgeable and fascinating script
add up to a movie experience that all film buffs should have.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for African Queen, The (1951)
     Directed by John Huston. Written by James Agee and John Huston. Starring
Humphrey Bogart and Katharine Hepburn, with Robert Morley and Peter Bull. 1951,
104 min., Not Rated.
     I'll be up front about this now, so that readers won't be surprised at the
lack of criticism in this review: John Huston's "The African Queen" is one of
my all-time favorite movies. The film begins with Reverend Samuel Sayer (Robert
Morley) and the members of his church singing. His sister, Rose (Katharine
Hepburn) is accompanying them, and eventually the crowd inside the church
disperses when a scuffle ensues outside between several villagers over a cigar
that Charlie Allnut (Humphrey Bogart) flicked to the ground.
     Sam and Rose go outside, where Charlie hands them their mail. He is
scruffy in appearance, a noticeable contrast to the clean-cut Sayers, who
invite him home for tea. Sam and Rose are embarrassed by but say nothing about
Charlie's growling stomach. As he readies himself to go back to his boat, The
African Queen, he mentions that a war has broken out. The siblings are
surprised and ask for details. Charlie says that the British and German are
fighting, as are many "little" countries, but he doesn't remember the
specifics.
     After he leaves, German soldiers invade the small African village that Sam
and Rose are living in as missionaries. They torch the dwellings of the
villagers and round them up, forcing them to march ahead to an uncertain
future. Sam and Rose are left behind, shaken. Charlie returns after awhile, and
Rose tells him that her brother has died. She gets her things together as
Charlie buries Sam, and the two set out for the African Queen, where they will
discuss their plans for escaping.
     The mismatched pair must learn, in spite of their disdain for one another,
to function as a team in order to survive, with comedic results. Hepburn and
Bogart have a humorous spark between them that really makes this film shine.
She is perfect as the straight-laced spinster, and he turns in an Academy Award
winning performance as the drunkard who becomes a hero with the help of a woman
who is his total opposite.
     In a somewhat unexpected plot twist, Rose, upon hearing that the Germans,
aboard the ship Louisa, may be nearby, eyes some of the materials on the
African Queen, and decides that Charlie and her are going to build a torpedo
with which they can destroy the Louisa. An incredulous Charlie agrees at first,
but later has second thoughts. As he realizes that she is more than a quaint
religious woman, and she realizes that he is more than a whiskey-swilling bum,
they become smitten with each other, sharing conversations about such things as
how they used to spend their Sunday afternoons (she would enjoy a nice, quiet
day, and he would usually be "sleeping one off").
     When Charlie gets cold feet about their plan and gets drunk, he wakes up
the next morning to find Rose pouring out the many bottles of gin he covets.
Although at first upset, we later see a revitalized man who is beginning to
regain control of his life and of the well being of himself and Rose. Facing
many obstacles, such as forces of nature and the ailing African Queen, they
finally catch some good luck and are once again hopeful.
     If you do not yet know how "The African Queen" ends, and do not wish to
find out, skip this and the next paragraph. After spotting the Louisa and
estimating how long it will be until they see it again, they begin preparing
the torpedo, and cleaning up the boat, as it will be representing the Royal
Navy. Before the Louisa passes and the plan can be put into motion, the African
Queen sinks and Charlie is captured by the Germans before finding Rose, who had
disappeared underwater.
     They are reunited on the Louisa, and are sentenced to execution by
hanging. Before they are killed, Charlie asks that they be married. The captain
agrees, and after they say "I do," the captain tells them, "I pronounce you man
and wife. Proceed with the execution." While the impromptu ceremony is
occurring, unbeknownst to everyone, the Louisa is nearing the mostly sunken
African Queen. As the nooses are slipped around Charlie and Rose's necks, the
Louisa brushes against the torpedo, and there is an explosion. The Louisa sinks
and the shocked duo bask in the ocean at their patriotic success.
     Filmed in Africa and London, "The African Queen" has wonderful
cinematography. The beauty of the African jungle and the harrowing experience
of the rapids are wonderfully brought to life. Huston is one of the greatest
directors in history, and this is yet another example of the best he had to
offer. Bogart gives the performance of his life, and Hepburn matches him stride
for stride. Perhaps the most extraordinary thing about this film is that it
starred two incredible screen legends that were completely in control of their
talents, and they work surprisingly well together, bringing to the movie a
special comedic chemistry that is the fuel behind the romance of Charlie and
Rose. The script, which Huston co-wrote with John Agee, moves swiftly and sets
the perfect tone for the movie.  This isn't the typical WWI movie, but it has
the elements of a top-notch adventure flick, plus much more. 
     Notes: Unfortunately, this film isn't available on DVD. It is priced at
under $10 on videotape, and also available in a more expensive collector's
edition.  Not rated, but suitable for family viewing.
    The Verdict: "The African Queen" is the quintessential adventure movie,
full of romance and laughs. Terrifically directed and acted, it is a true
classic that everyone should see at least once.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Affair to Remember, An (1957)
     Directed by Leo McCarey. Written by Delmar Daves and Leo McCarey. Starring
Cary Grant and Deborah Kerr, with Richard Denning and Cathleen Nesbitt. 1957,
115 min., Not Rated.
     In 1939, Leo McCarey (The Bells of St. Mary's, Going My Way) directed
"Love Affair," starring Charles Boyer and Irene Dunne. The film was a critical
success, and McCarey won two Academy Awards for it (direction and writing). For
some reason or another, he decided to remake the film in 1957. Although its
predecessor is widely considered to be the superior film, at the time, "An
Affair to Remember" won over audiences again. The film went on to be nominated
for four Academy Awards.
     "An Affair to Remember" opens with news segments from different parts of
the world, all announcing the engagement of Nickie "The Big Dame Hunter"
Ferrante (Cary Grant) to Lois Clark, a member of a family that is industrial
'royalty,' who is worth an estimated 600 million dollars. Nickie is on a cruise
from Paris to New York, and along the way meets Terry McKay (Deborah Kerr), a
former nightclub singer who was swept away from her former life by her
businessman boyfriend, Kenneth (Richard Denning), and is now focusing on
learning the kind of skills that will be necessary when she becomes his wife.
Of course, Nickie and Terry fall in love.
     A photographer stalks about the ship, secretly snapping photos of the
pair, who are resisting, without denying, their growing attraction. Nickie is a
well-known playboy, and Terry, who is reticent to acknowledge just why she
distrusts him (or rather, herself around him) agrees to accompany him on shore
one day, when he goes to visit his grandmother (Cathleen Nesbitt). They spend
the day together and get along well, and the tension between Nickie and Terry
is obvious. Grandmother Janou, when proposing a toast, instead of toasting
Nick's impending marriage to Lois, looks fondly at Nick and Terry, glasses
raised, and says, "May your voyage home be a pleasant one."
     Returning to the ship, they finally relent, and, in one of the most famous
proposals in cinematic history, decide that in six months they will meet at the
top of the Empire State Building. During this time, they will get their acts
together and decide what they want. If they both show up, they will be married.
     The first part of the movie, carried by Grant's comedic charms and Kerr's
engaging performance, sets a nice pace for the rest of the film, although the
final twenty minutes or so are overwrought enough to almost undo the promising
beginning. I found certain camera angles discerning, as the cinematography was
commended at the time of the film's initial release. The unsteadiness of the
sea and boat shots, giving the effect of the unevenness and rocking of the
waves, was a nice touch the first time, but unnecessary after that.
     Also, the chemistry between Grant and Kerr isn't as magnetic as that of
say, Grant and Katharine Hepburn, or Grant and Ingrid Bergman. Still, it works
out nicely. His blend of suavity and Kerr's graceful uncertainty lend
themselves to many clever shipboard shots (i.e., when she is on the stairs and
he is walking in circles around the staircase; the night at the dining hall
when they are unwittingly sitting in back-to-back booths) with the kind of
outcome that is rarely seen in films outside of that time in Hollywood. An
element of dated, saccharine-soaked implausibility is thrown into the mix when
Terry takes a position as a music teacher at a parochial school. Children sing
twice when once would have more than sufficed. This is a minor flaw, and given
its genre, can be taken in stride.
     The first time I saw this movie, I thought it dragged on for a bit too
long. Since then, I have seen it a couple more times, and I grow more fond of
the film each time I watch it. For example, when Terry returns from the cruise
and Kenneth arrives as she was trying to watch a television interview with
Nickie and Lois. This scene was one that I didn't originally like, but it has
since become one of my favorite scenes in the picture.  Some of the corny
lines, however, like anything that little kid who was stuck, upside down, on
the stair railing of the ship, said.
     Leo McCarey, who had directed Grant (opposite Irene Dunne) in the 1937
screwball comedy classic, "The Awful Truth," has some genuinely great shots in
this movie. Grant and Kerr, who would re-team in Stanley Donen's 1960 comedy
"The Grass is Greener," are up to their expected levels of greatness. Richard
Denning is competent as erstwhile Kenneth and Cathleen Nesbitt gives an
excellent supporting performance as Grandmother Janou. All of this adds up to a
romantic classic.
     Notes: Remade in 1994 as "Love Affair." Currently not available on DVD,
but the video is priced at under $10.  Not rated; kids might get bored after a
while, but there is nothing objectionable in it.
     The Verdict: Check out the 1939 "Love Affair" it is a remake of, but give
"An Affair to Remember" a try. You may not find it to be the tearjerker many
remember it as, but it is an unbeatable combination of lighthearted romantic
comedy and melodrama that will strike a chord with most audiences.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Desperate Hours, The (1955)
Directed by William Wyler. Written by Joseph Hayes. Starring Humphrey
Bogart, Fredric March, and Martha Scott, with Dewey Martin, Mary Murphy,
Richard Eyer, Gig Young, and Robert Middleton. 1955, 112 min., Not Rated.
Here we go again, Humphrey Bogart is holding folks hostage. Glenn Griffin,
his character in William Wyler's "The Desperate Hours" is quite different from
Duke Mantee of "The Petrified Forest," a role Bogart played on stage and in the
classic 1936 film adaptation with Bette Davis and Leslie Howard. For one thing,
Glenn never seems very threatening, in spite of how he acts around the members
of the family whose home he and a couple other freshly escaped convicts invade.
For another, the characterization of Glenn is so thinly drawn that he has no
edge, Bogart in one of his last roles, has little to do.
The Hilliards are a typical American family.  Eleanor, the wife and
mother, stays at (their suburban) home, and father Dan is in a profession left
sketchy, though we do know he wears a nifty suit to work every day and seems to
know Glenn a little. But this isn't "Cape Fear." Nineteen year-old daughter
Cindy (Mary Murphy) is being courted by a persistant lawyer (Gig Young) and
young son Ralphy wants his dad to see him as a man, despite the fact that he's
in grade school. "The Desperate Hours" begins as just another weekday in the
Hilliard household. Once breakfast is over and those she looks after have
cleared out, Eleanor is in the house alone when Glenn knocks at the door. She
lets him in, and he, brother Hal (Dewey Martin) and prison pal Kobish (Robert
Middleton) plan on staying at the Hilliard house until they receive the cash
Glenn's sweetheart is supposed to send.
That evening, once Dan, Cindy, and Ralphy have returned home, the family
begins what will become a test of mental endurance, trying not be held hostage
by the fear that the three intruders evoke. However, none of the three are very
intimidating. Glenn keeps his temper in check because he doesn't want to do
something wrong and end up in more trouble than he's already in. Hal, the
youngest of the trio of criminals, predictably falls for Cindy, watches a few
days in her life and decides he has to make a break and try to start over.
Kobish is the token overweight doofus with a penchant for booze.
Despite the claustrophobia of being in a home with three dangerous
convicts who are supposedly willing to kill to keep their freedom, the palpable
air of tension never evolves into anything more. The screenplay, adapted by
Joseph Hayes from his own play, is generic. The romance between the Murphy and
Young character's is a relatively weak subplot, and the detectives trying to
track down the brothers Griffin and tagalong Kobish serve mostly as diversions.
By this time, if you're engrossed at all, you'll want the cops to stay out of
it.
"The Desperate Hours" benefits from the sure direction of William Wyler
and solid acting. Fredric March, in the film's best performance, brings just
the right mix of sadness, anger, fear, and indignation at what is happening to
his family to his character, who embodies emotional core of the story. Twelve
years earlier, March had won the Best Actor Oscar for "The Best Years of Our
Lives," (directed by Wyler) and I'm mildly surprised that his work here wasn't
recognized in the form of a nomination. "The Desperate Hours" is not an
excellent film, but it will have you wondering how you'd act if your family
were in the position of the Hilliards.

Title
Review for Cabaret (1972)
     Directed by Bob Fosse.  Written by Jay Presson Allen.  Starring Liza
Minnelli and Michael York, with Joel Grey.  1972, 124 min., Rated PG.  
     Life is a cabaret, or so the famed song goes.  After watching "Cabaret,"
you'll agree to an extent, but also realize how unsettling the assertion is. 
Taking place in the early 1930s, Bob Fosse's masterpiece, a portrait of life in
decadent Berlin, is both uplifting and grim.  Not your typical musical, it is
comedic and dramatic, realistic, very tasteful, and ultimately thought
provoking.  
     Sally Bowles (Liza Minnelli) is an entertainer at the Kit Kat Club, a
German hot spot where the festivities are hosted by a charming Master of
Ceremonies (Joel Grey).  She is determined to become a movie star, and is
willing to bed whoever she has to for the opportunity to take a screen test. 
Brian Roberts (Michael York) is a mild-mannered young man from England who
wants to rent a room at the boarding house Sally resides in.  To support
himself, he will give English lessons, through which he meets Fritz Wendel
(Fritz Wepper), a nice guy who is down on his luck, and who decides that wooing
fellow English student Natalia Landauer (Marisa Berenson), daughter of a
wealthy Jewish businessman will solve his financial woes.  Meanwhile, Sally and
Brian are becoming friends, and Sally has more than friendship on her mind.
     She makes advances towards him, which he gently rebuffs, prompting her to
question whether or not he is interested in women.  When he responds by saying
that his three experiences, each with a different woman, had disastrous
results, Sally takes it in stride and says she'll settle for friendship.
However, they end up becoming involved.  From the beginning of their
relationship, it is clear that such a pairing will never work out, as their
bond is too pure.  
     As a catalyst for the eventual demise of her union with Brian, Sally meets
Maximilian von Heune (Helmut Griem), a handsome Baron who spends lavishly on
both her and Brian, who is initially resentful. This leads to one of the best
scenes of the film, in which the three of them, drunk, arms around one another,
move clumsily in a circle formation as music plays and then stops, their heads
moving close to one another again and again.  While nothing actually happens
between the three of them, something does; what will happen is yet another
unavoidable event.
     Some time afterwards, Brian and Sally argue over a comment she made to the
effect of Maximilian perhaps proposing to her during the trip to Africa the
three of them are going to take together.  Seven words, first two from Brian,
two from Sally, and then three from Brian in response, reveal that both of them
have been conducting affairs with Maximilian.  To complicate matters further,
Sally later discovers that she is pregnant.  With Max now out of the picture,
Brian proposes and Sally accepts.  They talk often of how the baby will change
their lives, but neither of them truly want the life they speak of, and once
Sally reflects on her relationship with Brian, her job at the Club, and her
ambitions, she makes a decision that seemed inevitable.  
     As Sally, a character first introduced in stories, before winding up on
stage, and on screen ("I Am a Camera," 1955, played by Julie Harris), Liza
Minnelli, in her Oscar winning turn, is simply captivating.  She is energetic,
charismatic, and a joy to watch.  Sally is confident, and Minnelli's confidence
as one of the greatest musical entertainers around shines through during her
musical numbers.  The script, by Jay Presson Allen, is witty and winning. 
Sally, a self-proclaimed most strange and extraordinary person, delivers lines
like "Doesn't my body drive you wild with desire?"  And there is no doubt that
her personality will leave everyone in her path positively smitten.
     York is nicely understated as Brian, and the other supporting performers,
Griem, Wepper, and Berenson, are convincing in their roles.  But Joel Grey, in
an Oscar winning role, reigns as the best of the secondary cast as the sly
emcee.  Director Bob Fosse masterfully staged the dance and musical numbers,
and he won the Academy Award for Best Director, beating out Francis Ford
Coppola, who's epic "The Godfather" in turn beat out "Cabaret" as the Best Film
of 1972.  Nominated for ten Oscars, Fosse's picture won eight.
     There is some incredible imagery in "Cabaret," but it isn't all of a
visible nature.  Many of the songs being belted out at the Kit Kat Club relate
to the lives of other characters, something that is often illustrated by
cutting from the performance to something that is happening elsewhere at the
same time.  But the focus never strays from the words in the songs, which is
fortunate, and there are times when showing us what is happening isn't
necessary, because many of the events in "Cabaret" were scripted by history,
and there is a strong sense of the bleak future of Germany and the party
lifestyle in general.  
     Nazism, especially it's rise in popularity, is depicted in what I found to
be the most chilling scene in the film, that of a young Nazi singing a
prophetic song as most of the crowd around him, including more Nazis, join in. 
But an elderly man sits there knowingly, and looks disgusted. Brian and Max,
who were watching the whole thing, got up and left, though Brian was the only
one visibly effected.
     "Cabaret" is the type of film that is both hard and easy to describe.  It
is easy to write of the events and of the movie in general, but it is
impossible to fully explain the depth of the characters or performances.  It is
simply one of the greatest movie musicals ever made, and there is a raw
humanity to it that is impossible to ignore.  It ends much like it started, and
time flies in the two hours in between.  While it may sound like the story of a
doomed affair, it is more.  The power and influence of the Nazi party is
growing, and the upheaval to come is weighing heavily on the group of friends
at the center of the story.  The Kit Kat Club, cabaret, it is all an escape
from the dim future of the world and their lives.  Is anyone as carefree in
"Cabaret" as they seem?  No.  And that is the point, I believe, of the movie.  
E-mail Heather Picker at Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Adam's Rib (1949)
     Directed by George Cukor.  Written by Ruth Gordon and Garson Kanin. 
Starring Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn, with Judy Holliday, Tom Ewell,
Jean Hagen and David Wayne.  1949, 101 min., Not Rated.
     Battle of the sexes films have become a comedic staple.  "Adam's Rib" is
one of the earliest examples of the best of that sub-genre.  The film opens
with a woman (Judy Holliday) following a man (Tom Ewell).  She barges into a
room to find him with the woman he is having an affair with (Jean Hagen), and,
unsteadily holding a pistol, fires repeatedly, wounding him (he survives).  Cut
to Adam and Amanda Bonner (Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn), Assistant
District Attorney and attorney-at-law, respectively.  Shortly after he wakes up
she reads a newspaper article to him about a woman named Doris Attinger who
shot her two-timing husband, Warren.  They talk about it, and it is clear that
the argument over whether or not the situation would be considered different
had it been a man assaulting his cheating wife, will not be settled for quite
some time.  
     Adam goes to his office to find that he has been assigned the dreaded
case.  When Amanda hears of this she does a bit of ambulance chasing and winds
up defending Doris, who is more than a bit ditzy.  Husband and wife prepare to
go to court, unaware of just how troublesome the duration of the trial will
prove to be for them, both professionally and personally.  Assigned to the case
because the District Attorney thinks he is the only man who can get the
conviction, Adam firmly believes that no one has the right to break any laws. 
Amanda presents a different story to the jury, making the case more about
sexual politics than actual law.  The courtroom becomes a circus, and her
strategy the bone of contention in their marriage.  
     The married screenwriting duo of Ruth Gordon and Garson Kanin crafted a
witty script that provides many laughs, but also tries to focus on gender
equality issues.  Tracy and Hepburn, in their fifth film together, have
unparalleled chemistry that makes their scenes together jump off the screen
with immense believability.  They are supported by one of the greatest comedic
casts of the 1940s.  Judy Holliday is marvelous as the light-headed, sarcastic
Doris, Tom Ewell is appropriately whiney and smarmy as Warren (and very funny
as seen in a dress during Amanda's closing statements), Jean Hagen is perfect
as his mistress, Beryl Caighn, and David Wayne steals every scene he is in as
Kip Lurie, a songwriter and singer who lives in the apartment across from the
Bonners and is smitten with Amanda.  (His ode to her is provided by Cole
Porter.)  George Cukor's direction, as usual, is confident and mostly seamless.
 Many funny parts of the film take place off-screen, with dialogue and/or
background noise being our only indicator as to what is occurring, and I think
it takes a true pro to make those types of scenes work.  The only parts of
"Adam's Rib" that weren't necessary were the questioning of women that Amanda
brought into the trial in order to prove that women can do anything men can.   
     For you trivia buffs: Famous collaborations are abound in "Adam's Rib." 
Director George Cukor worked frequently with Katharine Hepburn, who in turn
made eight movies with Spencer Tracy.  Screenwriter Kanin's brother, Michael,
co-wrote "Woman of the Year," Tracy and Hepburn's first film (1942, directed by
George Stevens) together, and Kanin himself wrote the play "Born Yesterday,"
which made Judy Holliday a star.  Gordon and Kanin, three years later, wrote
another Tracy/Hepburn classic, "Pat and Mike."
     DVD Details: MGM brings another one of their classics to DVD with little
fanfare.  The only supplementary feature is the original theatrical trailer. 
The actual film is presented standard, full-frame format "preserving the aspect
ratio of its original theatrical exhibition."  The transfer is outstanding,
very sharp and with nice contrasts between the different variations of gray
tones.  The mono sound suits the movie well, as the dialogue is crisp and
clear.  English and French language tracks, English, French, and Spanish
subtitles, and English captioning for the hearing impaired, as well as scene
selections.  The main menu is very simplistic, using a design seen throughout
the movie as it's backdrop.  Snapper case.   
     The Verdict: "Adam's Rib" is a delightful, occasionally daring,
battle-of-the-sexes screwball comedy with a witty script and superlative
performances.  Recommended for screwball, classic, and/or Tracy/Hepburn
aficionados, best viewed on DVD.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Ball of Fire (1941)
     Directed by Howard Hawks.  Written by Charles Brackett and Billy Wilder. 
Starring Barbara Stanwyck and Gary Cooper.  1941, 111 min., Not Rated.  
     "Ball of Fire" is a screwball comedy in which Gary Cooper plays an English
professor, Bertrand Potts, who has spent the last eight years in seclusion with
seven colleagues, compiling an encyclopedia. When he discovers that the slang
terms he was going to use in the encyclopedia are outdated, he enlists the help
of a group of "normal" folk with healthy slang vocabularies to assist him in
compiling terms.
     Among the members of the group is Sugarpuss O'Shea, a burlesque dancer and
gangster's moll who has to hide from the authorities because her boyfriend is
in trouble with the law. The script was written by Charles Brackett and Billy
Wilder, and Wilder's influence is more evident, though it still isn't nearly as
powerful as it would be when the Wilder/Stanwyck collaborations reached their
creative peak three years later in 1944 when he directed and co-wrote "Double
Indemnity," in which she gave a definitive performance as a femme fatale.  
     Sugarpuss and Professor Potts become involved, which threatens their lives
and the encyclopedia project.  Never mind the fact that at first she only
pretends to love him to bide time before hastily planned nuptials to her mob
boyfriend, who himself has only proposed because he faces criminal charges and
Sugarpuss doesn't have to testify against him if they're married.  Her
indecisiveness when it comes time for the wedding should seem contrived, as by
this time the plot is wearing thin, but Stanwyck and Cooper nicely manage to
keep the film afloat.  "Ball of Fire" was one of the last screwball comedies
made before World War II, and though not hysterical, as other Howard
Hawks-directed screwball vehicles are, it will hold interest because of great
performances. (Note the Snow White story and visual references.)  Hawks remade
it seven years later as "A Song is Born."
Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
     Written and Directed by Lisa Cholodenko.  Starring Ally Sheedy and Radha
Mitchell, with Patricia Clarkson and Gabriel Mann.  1998, 101 min., Rated R.
     Getting high and photography are very much a part of Lucy Berliner's (Ally
Sheedy) life. With that in mind, the title of "High Art" takes on a
double-meaning, as do many things in this, the feature-film debut of director
Lisa Cholodenko, who also wrote the script.  Lucy is a has-been, once at the
top of her game as a photographer.  She has sunk into oblivion with live-in
girlfriend Greta (Patricia Clarkson), a washed-up, drugged out German actress
who worked with Fassbinder.  
     Syd (Radha Mitchell, "Love and Other Catastrophes") has just been promoted
to an assistant editor status at Frame magazine, which is about what else but
photography.  Her job mainly consists of running errands for her superiors, to
which live-in boyfriend James (Gabriel Mann) is sympathetic.  One evening,
while taking a bath, Syd notices a leak coming from the ceiling, and decides to
visit her neighbor's apartment upstairs to see if she can fix it.  By this
time, anyone who doesn't know what will end up happening between Syd and Lucy
may have a feeling of deja vu, as women going to another residence to do
handywork, usually plumbing, always seem to end up romantically involved with
the woman of the house ("French Twist," "Bound").  
     As Syd tries to fix the leak, engaging in small talk with Lucy, she
notices the beautiful photographs that cover the walls of the apartment.
 Within days, Syd has found out more about Lucy's career, and the two of them
meet with Syd's bosses for lunch, in hopes of Lucy shooting a cover for Frame.
 Lucy reticently agrees to the project, but on the condition that Syd will be
her editor.
     The attraction between the women grows, and when Lucy wants to get away
for the weekend to work, and asks Syd to join her, James, who has become
suspicious of Syd's involvement with Lucy, asks if she has slept with her.  She
says no, and when he asks if she's leading up to it, she professes that she
doesn't know.  And later, when things heat up between her and Lucy, she admits
that she doesn't know what to do, also tearfully tells Lucy that she thinks she
is falling in love with her.  The next morning, Lucy takes photographs that she
will eventually ask to be used for Frame.
     When the two go back home, Lucy decides that things have to change.  She
wants to turn her life around.  She is through with drugs, and she is through
with Greta.  But addictions are never that easy to overcome, and withdrawn
resignation from a chance at happiness is something Lucy is familiar with.  Syd
returns to her apartment to find that James has left, and he is avoiding her
phone calls.  Lucy and Syd meet again, and this time Lucy gives her the
photographs that she took over their weekend together, and says that she wants
Frame to use them.  Syd is incomfortable with this idea, so Lucy also leaves
photos of Greta before going back upstairs, where Greta accepts that their
relationship is over, but implores Lucy to stay one more night. The ending came
as a bit of a surprise to me the first time I saw it.  The decisions that both
characters make were predictable, but one took much more courage than the
other.
     Cholodenko shot "High Art" in a simple yet visually mesmerizing way that
has a documentary feel.  The camera is perpetually close to Lucy and Syd, maybe
in symbolism to their relationship. There is a scene in which Syd comes home
after doing drugs at Lucy's, and initiates sex with James.  But she is
pathetically wasted, and soon falls asleep.  During this, the camera is much
farther away than it is during the Syd/Lucy scene, which is quietly beautiful
in it's unintrusive style and honest dialogue.  
     The script, a nice counterpart to the glorification of heroin chic, will
be considered pretentious by some.  Syd comments on the composition of some of
Lucy's photos, and Lucy replies that it's been a long time since she has been
deconstructed.  I found the script to be so sufficient in character
development, and observant, natural dialogue that I wasn't bothered by such
exchanges.  "High Art" can also boast some of the best acting of 1998.
 Clarkson steals every scene she is in, with a voice deeper than that of Garbo
and the look of someone who has been lost in her own universe for years and has
given up living.  William Sage, as Arnie, a hanger-on who lounges around the
apartment all day and into the night as to not miss out on the sharing of
heroin and anything else he can get his hands on, gives a similarily strong,
on-target performance.
     Sheedy's work here is Oscar-caliber.  As Lucy she is world weary and
defiant, struggling to deal with the contrasts between the life she has known
for the ten years since she dropped from public conscience and the sense of
rediscovery that Syd has brought to her life.  She wants to turn her life
around, but at the same time is skeptical that it is possible.  Telling her
mother (played by Tammy Grimes), who is a rich old woman who can't believe that
her daughter lives with a woman much less a "German" (which is all she refers
to Greta as), that she has a love issue and a drug problem, or a drug issue and
a love problem, you can see her gathering the strength to tell her mom about
her drug addiction.  But as soon as she does, her mother gets up and walks
away, meeting her daughter's expectations.  You can tell that this has happened
time and again in their strained relationship.  
     Mitchell and Sheedy have chemistry, and Mitchell is convincing as Syd,
movingly conveying her admiration for Lucy as it evolves from a crush to
infatuation.  She is engaged by being in the presence of such a gifted artist,
and her need to be around that fits so perfectly with Lucy's own needs to be
appreciated that in the end several interesting questions are posed, including
how subjective Syd could ultimately be about Lucy's work because of their
relationship and her own involvement with the photographs.  Would Syd and Lucy
have become involved if the art aspect was completely removed from the
situation?  See "High Art" and judge for yourself.  
Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com
E-mail: Ahber16@aol.com

Title
Review for Woman of the Year (1942)
     Directed by George Stevens.  Written by Ring Lardner, Jr., and Michael
Kanin.  Starring Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn, with Fay Bainter.  1942,
114 min., Not Rated.
     "Woman of the Year" is a landmark film if only for one reason, that being
it was the first teaming of Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn.  It is
remembered as an alternately comedic/dramatic classic, and while the chemistry
between Tracy and Hepburn is undeniable and engrossing, it is at times in
question whether or not they can overcome the contrived material they have to
work with.  Tess Harding (Hepburn) is one of the most respected, high-profile
political commentators in the world.  Sam Craig (Tracy) is your average Joe
sports columnist for the same newspaper Tess works for, and when she makes a
baseball comment on a radio program that gets Sam fuming, the two begin
directing critical jabs at one another in their columns.  They are, of course,
destined to fall in love.
     The courtship is hurried, like everything in Tess' aristocratic and
workaholic life.  This becomes too much for Sam to handle, and their marriage
is jeopardized by her career.  What has the potential to become a great
battle-of-the-sexes comedy, like their fifth film together, "Adam's Rib," is
instead marred by a grasping-at-straws script, co-penned by Ring Lardner, Jr.,
and Michael Kanin.  By the end of the movie I was not only aware of how long
I'd been watching it for (almost two hours), which is never a good sign, but
also of how it would end, which was a typical early 40s ending that the
writer's coyly left a shred of hopefulness about.  The truth is that neither
the characters nor their relationship were developed enough to give the
audience much to root for.  It's only saving grace was the Tracy/Hepburn
chemistry.  
     If the some of the drama had been cut out, and more scenes, like Sam
trying to explain baseball to Tess as she watches a game for the first time,
were in, "Woman of the Year" wouldn't seem as uneven.  In spite of this fault,
there are moments of hilarity and Tracy and Hepburn are reason enough to watch
it and form your own opinion.  Produced by Joseph L. Mankiewicz, and directed
by George Stevens ("Giant," "Alice Adams"), I wondered how much different the
film would be had George Cukor, with his light-touch and comic genius, directed
it.    
     DVD Details: This is a standard MGM release with one exception, the
absence of an 8-page production booklet, which is explained by this being a
snapper release instead of the usual keepcase packaging.  The film is shown in
full-frame format, preserving it's original aspect ratio.  The transfer is
top-notch, with only occasional, minor flaws, and the contrast between grays is
clearly defined.  The mono (one track) soundtrack is surprisingly clear for a
film so old.  Also included is the original theatrical trailer.  English,
French, and Spanish language tracks and subtitles are present, as is English
captioning for the hearing impaired; scene selections.     
     Notes: The video is out-of-print.  Not rated, suitable for all audiences. 
     The Verdict: "Woman of the Year" is notable for being the first film that
Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn starred in together.  It is also often
funny, but forced drama makes parts of the movie uninvolving.  Worth a view,
best seen on DVD.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Sherlock, Jr. (1924)
     Directed by Buster Keaton.  Story by Jean Havez, Joe Mitchell, and Clyde
Bruckman.  Starring Buster Keaton, with Kathryn McGuire.  1924, 45 min., Not
Rated.
     "Sherlock Jr." features extraordinary visual trickery and yet another
charming Buster Keaton performance.  Keaton is a projectionist who is timidly
and successfully vying for the affections of a girl (Kathryn McGuire) until her
father's watch disappears and he is framed by her other suitor, a criminal.
Reality and fantasy are masterfully interwoven as the dejected projectionist,
whose aspiration is to become a detective, winds up in the movie he is playing
for a packed theater.  Keaton breezes through a series of astounding shots with
an equally impressive ease.  
     The forty-five minute running time flies by, leaving you enchanted and
pondering the implications of the projectionist's reliance upon cinematic
example to interact with McGuire. Keaton's father, Joe, plays the girl's
father.  Jean Havez, Joe Mitchell, and Clyde Bruckman, who are responsible for
the story, also wrote "The Navigator" (1924), a Keaton classic in which McGuire
has a part, and his "Seven Chances" (1925).  Cinematography by Byron Houck and
Elgin Lessley, who worked on the two aforementioned films, as well.  

Title
Review for Birds, The (1963)
     Directed by Alfred Hitchcock. Written by Evan Hunter. Starring Tippi
Hedren and Rod Taylor, with Jessica Tandy, Veronica Cartwright, and Suzanne
Pleshette. 1963, 119 min., Not Rated.
     The plot of Alfred Hitchcock's 1963 "The Birds," taken from a Daphne Du
Maurier (who wrote the novel "Rebecca") short story, seems ludicrous. Birds
attacking a small town, actually killing people. But in the competent hands of
the master of suspense, the movie is frighteningly, well, suspenseful. Evan
Hunter (who also writes under the name Ed McBain) wrote the screenplay, and
while not all of the characters are well enough developed for the viewer to
understand their occasionally awkward behavior, has nonetheless crafted an
interesting story that captures and maintains interest.
     Birds are flapping about in the opening shots, a forewarning of their
sinister activities to come, before we're introduced to Melanie Daniels (Tippi
Hedren), the daughter of a newspaper owner. As she walks into a pet shop
director Hitchcock makes his signature cameo appearance (walking his two
real-life dogs). She meets a handsome defense attorney named Mitch Brenner (Rod
Taylor), and pretends to work at the store when he asks for help finding
lovebirds for his little sister's birthday. He embarrasses her by saying that
he remembers her from a court appearance (one of her practical jokes resulted
in a broken window), and that he just led her on to give her a taste of her own
medicine.
     Curious about Mitch and not to be outdone, Melanie buys two lovebirds and
tracks him down. She makes a trip to Bodega Bay, where he lives on the weekends
with his widowed mother, Lydia (Jessica Tandy) and sister, Cathy (Veronica
Cartwright), sneaks into the empty house, and leaves the birds for Cathy. He
spots her as she begins leaving in a boat, and drives off to meet her at the
dock, when, as she comes closer to it, a gull sweeps down and pecks her head.
Mitch takes her to the local diner and takes care of her cut.
     Melanie decides to stay in town for the night, and reappears at the home
of schoolteacher Annie Hayworth (Suzanne Pleshette), who had given her
directions to the Brenner house earlier. She sleeps over at Annie's house, and
the two women talk. Annie's odd behavior earlier in the day (her presumptuous
questions about Melanie's relationship with Mitch, etc.) is explained when she
says that she used to be involved with Mitch. Melanie is about to get ready for
bed when the women hear a noise at the door. Annie opens it to find that a bird
had flown into it, falling to the porch, dead.
     The birds begin more direct attacks on the town, first going after
children at Cathy's birthday party, and then infiltrating the Brenner's house
through the fireplace. The next day, Lydia leaves to drop Cathy off at school
and goes over to a farmer's house to talk about why her chickens aren't eating,
when she discovers the man's dead body, ravaged by the birds. In a surprisingly
graphic shot (for 1963), we see his blood-filled eye sockets. Lydia rushes
home, shaken, and when Melanie brings her tea in bed later that morning, the
two women have a conversation that sort of clears up the indifferent attitude
Lydia had been displaying towards Melanie.
     Melanie tells Lydia, who isn't certain that Cathy is safe at school, that
she will go  to the school and bring her back. Class is in session, so Melanie
goes outside to the playground and, as she lights a cigarette, birds begin
gathering quietly behind her. When she becomes aware of them, she goes inside
and notifies Miss Hayworth.  They give the children instructions as to how to
evacuate, hopefully without provoking attack.  In one of the many cool scenes
where birds are chasing people, the school children are shown being attacked as
they are running home.
     I don't want to give away too much more of the story, but I will say that
the following things occur: more talk about other weird bird encounters from
people who learn of the attack at school, an explosion, another dead body is
found, there is another attack, a power outage, and an attack on Melanie that
is at times visually reminiscent of Janet Leigh's shower stabbing in "Psycho."
     One of my favorite things about "The Birds" is the ending. It doesn't
offer an explanation, and it doesn't offer a way out. Instead, it shows birds
covering almost everything in sight. Originally, Hitchcock wanted the last shot
to be of the Golden Gate Bridge covered in birds, but it didn't work out.
Cleverly, this is the only of his films that don't end with the words, "The
End." He wanted to suggest endless terror, and indeed the closing shots of the
movie are potent.
     Tippi Hedren, who starred as a kleptomaniac in Hitchcock's "Marnie" the
year after "The Birds" was released, is very good as Melanie. Rod Taylor does
well with his character, one of the few leading men in a Hitchcock film who
isn't given the hero treatment, and Suzanne Pleshette is noteworthy as the
fairly mysterious Annie.  But I found myself focusing more on Jessica Tandy as
Lydia. Her character was the most complex, and she gives the best performance
in the film as the mother who wants her son to be happy but is struggling with
the unresolved abandonment issues deriving from her husband's death. Veronica
Cartwright is a bit uneven as Cathy, but becomes more believable towards the
end.
    Many people assumed that a movie about killer birds couldn't be as
satisfying a thriller as such (then) recent Hitchcock fare as "Vertigo," "North
by Northwest," and "Psycho."  But quite on the contrary, he makes the danger of
the situation palpable from the start, and builds to an even more tense and
unresolved ending that is riveting. The script, especially the setting, is most
commendable for never making suspension of disbelief necessary, as it would be
if reasoning behind the bird's behavior had been thrown in (such as the end of
"Psycho," where the psychologist's monologue, which didn't diminish the film,
was still unnecessary). One could argue that if you watch a movie about
homicidal birds, you have to suspend your disbelief, but such people have
doubtlessly never seen "The Birds," which has such convincing performances and
meticulous direction lending to an atmosphere that never makes it seem odd that
such small, harmless looking creatures could unleash such terror.
     Notes: Hasn't been released on DVD. Originally, this film wasn't given a
rating, as the rating system didn't get its start until three years later.
However, it has since been classified as PG-13.
    The Verdict: Sit back and enjoy the atmospheric suspense. Hitchcock's "The
Birds," is required viewing for any fan of the genre or the Master.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for All Over Me (1997)
     Directed by Alex Sichel. Written by Sylvia Sichel. Starring Alison Folland
and Tara Subkoff, with Cole Hauser and Wilson Cruz. 1997, 95 min., Rated R.
     The teen coming-of-age film came to popularity in the 1950s and over the
years has gone through many changes. From the angst-filled rebellion melodramas
of the 50s to the beach fluff of the early 60s, wistful looks back at the brink
of adulthood in the 70s, and John Hughes in the 80s...Along come the 90s,
somewhat hard to define. Raging hormones, insecurity, and the internal conflict
between wanting to be independent but also fearing adulthood can be seen more
on television, which has become a wasteland for teen-oriented programming, than
in the movies that the same actors and actresses from the over-hyped television
shows are starring in. Where is a viewer looking for an intelligent look at
normal teens supposed to turn? "All Over Me," the feature film debut of the
writing and directing Sichel sisters duo, is high on the list of alternatives.
      Claude (Alison Folland) and Ellen (Tara Subkoff) are inseparable. They
spend almost every waking hour together at the Hell's Kitchen apartment Claude
lives in with her mom. Their bond is closer than close, it is the type of
intense friendship that has a way of alienating others around them, and to an
extent, alienates themselves. Claude loves Ellen on more levels than just
friendship, and Ellen seems to reciprocate these feelings but can't deal with
them and instead turns to a homophobic, drug-pushing boyfriend, Mark (Cole
Hauser, "Higher Learning") and begins a downward spiral into drug addiction.
     As she begins to fully realize and accept her sexuality, Claude becomes
friends with Luke (Pat Briggs of the alternative rock band Psychotica), her
neighbor, and Jesse, who works with her at a pizza place (Wilson Cruz, playing
a role similar to his character on the late TV show "My So-Called Life"). Both
of them are gay, and her frustration over the Ellen situation is both eased and
complicated when she meets Lucy (Leisha Hailey of The Murmurs, who contribute a
song to the soundtrack), who performs in a rock band, which has long been a
dream of Claude's, one that she used to half-heartedly pursue with Ellen.
Claude and Lucy begin a stop and go relationship that nicely progresses as
Claude grapples with Ellen drifting out of the picture.
     As the fates of these two high school students with the expanding rift
between them become clearer, so does the depth of the performances. Folland
("To Die For") brings all of the elements of Claude, curiosity, fear,
awkwardness, uncertainty, beautifully to the screen.  Though portraits of teen
druggie characters usually lose credibility due to over-exaggerated acting,
Subkoff is rather subdued at times, and never overdoes it. The supporting cast,
including Hauser, Cruz, musicians Briggs and Hailey, and Ann Dowd as Claude'
mom, Anne, are all good. Alex Sichel directs, based on one of the few recent
scripts to treat various teenage topics honestly, written by her sister,
Sylvia. "All Over Me" has a terrific soundtrack featuring music from Ani
DiFranco, the Geraldine Fibbers, and Sleater-Kinney, among others.  Useless
trivia: One of the producers, Dolly Hall, has produced several films including
"High Art" (1998) and "The Incredibly True Adventures of Two Girls in Love"
(1995).  Noteworthy cinematography by Joe DeSalvo.
        
Š Heather Picker 1999
http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for World Moves On, The (1934)
     Directed by John Ford.  Written by Reginald Berkeley.  Starring Madeleine
Carroll and Franchot Tone, with Reginald Denny.  1934, 104 min., Not Rated.
     In 1935 John Ford's "The Informer" became a big hit, the year before he'd
made three films, one of which was "The World Moves On" (the others were "Judge
Priest" and "The Lost Patrol").  Madeleine Carroll and Franchot Tone star as
members of opposing sides of the family at the helm of a company that is the
most prosperous in the cotton industry.  They first meet in 1825 in New
Orleans, after the death of Sebastian Girard, patriarch of the American side of
the successful family.  He left detailed instructions as to how he expected
business matters to be handled once he was gone, these plans included the
family business becoming more fully affiliated with Mr. Warburton, and
expansion to Europe.  Each of his sons was given a region that they'd be in
charge of, and Richard (Tone) was to take his father's place as the head of the
company.  The Warburton and Girard partnership begins, and both families agree
that nothing will stand in the way of the success of their business affairs,
which is spelled out in a toast that is repeated throughout the next hundred
years.
     Because of this pact of sorts, and their own senses of decency, Richard
and Mrs. Warburton (Carroll), who have fallen in love, do nothing about it. 
Four successful generations later, a young Richard Girard meets Mary Warburton,
and the two have a sense of déjŕ vu.   Serving as stumbling blocks on their
road to happiness are her engagement to Erik von Gerhardt (Reginald Denny), one
of their relatives who is in charge of the company's German operations, and
World War I.  Tone is charismatic and he and Carroll have adequate chemistry;
the relationship between their characters is unevenly written at times, but
ultimately satisfactory.  
     The family saga continues through the stock market crash of 1929, and ends
on a hopeful note with it's not-so-subtle visual salute to religion and
spirituality.  Ford's style shines through, specifically in a couple of intense
battle scenes, and for his work he won a Special Recommendation at the Venice
Film Festival, but the Reginald Berkeley script teeters on becoming tiresome
and several minutes could have been shaved off the running time. 
Cinematography by George Schneidermann (who'd worked with Ford on "Judge
Priest") and good performances by Tone, Carroll, and Denny.  The supporting
cast including Sig Rumann, Louise Dresser, and Stepin Fetchit, giving one of
his trademark over-the-top performances (which many later pointed to as prime
examples of insulting African American stereotypes).  Francis Ford, John's
older brother, appears briefly as a legionnaire.   

Title
Review for Amazing Quest of Ernest Bliss, The (1936)
     Directed by Alfred Zeisler.  Written by John L. Balderston.  Starring Cary
Grant, with Mary Brian.  1936, 70 min., Not Rated.
     In a long gone era, films about the undying spirit of the poor were
common.  Earnest protagonists worked hard to prove themselves, sometimes to
their families, sometimes to themselves, and sometimes to a gal who seems out
of his league.  Is it coincidence that the hero of "Amazing Adventure" is named
Ernest? Ernest Bliss (Cary Grant) receives a large inheritance and decides to
work for a living anyway, in part to prove himself to the working-class woman
he loves (played by Mary Brian).  
     This is a chance to see Grant before he became a huge star, and while he
isn't the most incredible of actors in "Amazing Adventure," it is noteworthy
for being one of the films he made outside of the Hollywood system (it was made
in the UK).  Despite a not-so involving script by John L. Balderston, Grant
fans will find it worth 70 minutes of their time.  In 1944 he'd return to his
British roots with "None But the Lonely Heart," in which he earned an Oscar
nomination as a Cockney drifter.  Known originally as "The Amazing Quest of
Ernest Bliss" in the UK.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1963)
Directed by Robert Wise.  Written by Nelson Gidding.  Starring Julie
Harris, Claire Bloom, Richard Johnson, and Russ Tamblyn.  1963, 112 min., Rated
G.
     In 1963, as movie-goers were being treated to a new Hitchcock experience
that would leave them afraid of birds, director Robert Wise ("The Body
Snatcher," "West Side Story") brought to the big screen a chilling, literate
adaptation, thanks to screenwriter Nelson Gidding, of the classic Shirley
Jackson novel "The Haunting of Hill House."  A haunted house story, how scary
can it be?  Well, it is fairly nerve wracking and lots of fun to behold, in
this instance.  
     Hill House has a long history of depression and death and  it is
supposedly haunted.   Dr. Markway (Richard Johnson) is the expert on the
supernatural who has asked a few people who've had otherworldly experiences or
gifts, to join him in a stay at the house, during which time he'll be
investigating and hopefully observing the reported paranormal events that occur
in the house.   Eleanor (Julie Harris) is an emotionally fragile woman whose
life, until recently, has been consumed by caring for her ill mother, which she
greatly resents but feels somewhat ashamed to admit.   This provides a bit of a
parallel between Eleanor's fate and that of a young woman who was once brought
to Hill House to care for one of it's original inhabitants.
     Theodora (Claire Bloom), who was chosen for her acute sixth sense, is one
of the first screen lesbians to not be written or portrayed as evil and
predatory, which is refreshing.   However, the overtones concerning Theo and
Nell aren't all that subtle at times, which becomes distracting. Rounding out
the group is skeptic Luke (Russ Tamblyn), heir to the mansion.   At first he
cares only about how much money the house and it's possessions will fetch him
(as his aunt puts it, he has intended to live off the house, but never in it),
but that will eventually change.
     Gripping, great entertainment with a bravura Harris performance that many
Sandy Dennis roles evoke.  Bloom's nicely underplayed Theodora, and Tamblyn's
wisecracking Luke were my favorite characters, though Johnson is appropriately
authoritative as Dr. Markway.   Wise employs a visual style that was ahead of
its time, and Gidding's script is first-rate.   Moody lighting and the Gothic
mansion look beautiful, and the story never panders to the "I've gotta see it
to believe it" notion, which makes the suspense all the more delightful.  
Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for African Queen, The (1951)
     Directed by John Huston. Written by James Agee and John Huston. Starring
Humphrey Bogart and Katharine Hepburn, with Robert Morley and Peter Bull. 1951,
104 min., Not Rated.
     I'll be up front about this now, so that readers won't be surprised at the
lack of criticism in this review: John Huston's "The African Queen" is one of
my all-time favorite movies. The film begins with Reverend Samuel Sayer (Robert
Morley) and the members of his church singing. His sister, Rose (Katharine
Hepburn) is accompanying them, and eventually the crowd inside the church
disperses when a scuffle ensues outside between several villagers over a cigar
that Charlie Allnut (Humphrey Bogart) flicked to the ground.
     Sam and Rose go outside, where Charlie hands them their mail. He is
scruffy in appearance, a noticeable contrast to the clean-cut Sayers, who
invite him home for tea. Sam and Rose are embarrassed by but say nothing about
Charlie's growling stomach. As he readies himself to go back to his boat, The
African Queen, he mentions that a war has broken out. The siblings are
surprised and ask for details. Charlie says that the British and German are
fighting, as are many "little" countries, but he doesn't remember the
specifics.
     After he leaves, German soldiers invade the small African village that Sam
and Rose are living in as missionaries. They torch the dwellings of the
villagers and round them up, forcing them to march ahead to an uncertain
future. Sam and Rose are left behind, shaken. Charlie returns after awhile, and
Rose tells him that her brother has died. She gets her things together as
Charlie buries Sam, and the two set out for the African Queen, where they will
discuss their plans for escaping.
     The mismatched pair must learn, in spite of their disdain for one another,
to function as a team in order to survive, with comedic results. Hepburn and
Bogart have a humorous spark between them that really makes this film shine.
She is perfect as the straight-laced spinster, and he turns in an Academy Award
winning performance as the drunkard who becomes a hero with the help of a woman
who is his total opposite.
     In a somewhat unexpected plot twist, Rose, upon hearing that the Germans,
aboard the ship Louisa, may be nearby, eyes some of the materials on the
African Queen, and decides that Charlie and her are going to build a torpedo
with which they can destroy the Louisa. An incredulous Charlie agrees at first,
but later has second thoughts. As he realizes that she is more than a quaint
religious woman, and she realizes that he is more than a whiskey-swilling bum,
they become smitten with each other, sharing conversations about such things as
how they used to spend their Sunday afternoons (she would enjoy a nice, quiet
day, and he would usually be "sleeping one off").
     When Charlie gets cold feet about their plan and gets drunk, he wakes up
the next morning to find Rose pouring out the many bottles of gin he covets.
Although at first upset, we later see a revitalized man who is beginning to
regain control of his life and of the well being of himself and Rose. Facing
many obstacles, such as forces of nature and the ailing African Queen, they
finally catch some good luck and are once again hopeful.
     If you do not yet know how "The African Queen" ends, and do not wish to
find out, skip this and the next paragraph. After spotting the Louisa and
estimating how long it will be until they see it again, they begin preparing
the torpedo, and cleaning up the boat, as it will be representing the Royal
Navy. Before the Louisa passes and the plan can be put into motion, the African
Queen sinks and Charlie is captured by the Germans before finding Rose, who had
disappeared underwater.
     They are reunited on the Louisa, and are sentenced to execution by
hanging. Before they are killed, Charlie asks that they be married. The captain
agrees, and after they say "I do," the captain tells them, "I pronounce you man
and wife. Proceed with the execution." While the impromptu ceremony is
occurring, unbeknownst to everyone, the Louisa is nearing the mostly sunken
African Queen. As the nooses are slipped around Charlie and Rose's necks, the
Louisa brushes against the torpedo, and there is an explosion. The Louisa sinks
and the shocked duo bask in the ocean at their patriotic success.
     Filmed in Africa and London, "The African Queen" has wonderful
cinematography. The beauty of the African jungle and the harrowing experience
of the rapids are wonderfully brought to life. Huston is one of the greatest
directors in history, and this is yet another example of the best he had to
offer. Bogart gives the performance of his life, and Hepburn matches him stride
for stride. Perhaps the most extraordinary thing about this film is that it
starred two incredible screen legends that were completely in control of their
talents, and they work surprisingly well together, bringing to the movie a
special comedic chemistry that is the fuel behind the romance of Charlie and
Rose. The script, which Huston co-wrote with John Agee, moves swiftly and sets
the perfect tone for the movie.  This isn't the typical WWI movie, but it has
the elements of a top-notch adventure flick, plus much more. 
     Notes: Unfortunately, this film isn't available on DVD. It is priced at
under $10 on videotape, and also available in a more expensive collector's
edition.  Not rated, but suitable for family viewing.
    The Verdict: "The African Queen" is the quintessential adventure movie,
full of romance and laughs. Terrifically directed and acted, it is a true
classic that everyone should see at least once.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Title
Review for Frenzy (1972)
     Directed by Alfred Hitchcock.  Written by Anthony Shaffer.  Starring Jon
Finch and Barry Foster, with Alec McCowen and Anna Massey.  1972, 116 min.,
Rated R.
     Alfred Hitchcock's films were more often than not crowd pleasers, so when
he embarked on a three-film box-office drought with "Marnie" (1964), "Torn
Curtain" (1966) and "Topaz" (1969) which mostly received favorable critical
reaction but did little otherwise, Hitchcock himself knew that his next release
was critical.  Luckily, for general audiences as well as us Hitchcock
connoisseurs, he delivered with his 1972 thriller "Frenzy."  The wrong man
plot, used in so many of the director's pieces of work, is explored in "Frenzy"
as the Necktie killer terrorizes London by raping and then strangling his
victims, leaving as his calling card a necktie wrapped tightly around their
necks.  
     Richard Blaney (Jon Finch), a bartender who we first see as he puts on a
tie, has been having a hard time since divorcing his wife, Brenda, two years
ago after a decade of marriage.  He is now seeing Babs Milligan (Anna Massey,
who makes an impression during her screen time), who works with him at the pub,
but things aren't going so smoothly there and after a heated confrontation with
his boss, Richard is fired.  He goes to see his friend Robert Rusk (Barry
Foster, who should've stolen the show but somehow doesn't manage to-though he
does have some great scenes), a green grocer (as was Hitchcock's father) who
runs a nearby market, and ends up drinking away what money he has and spending
the night at a shelter.  After a spat with his wife, who runs a dating service
he visited her at, he and Brenda set the past aside as she tries to help him
sort through his problems.  
     Within 24 hours, Brenda is dead and Richard is the prime suspect.  He and
Babs lay low as he tries to come up with a way to clear his name, but it is
seemingly impossible because there are no other suspects.  I could give away
more of the plot without spoiling anything, as the identity of the killer isn't
kept a secret for long, but will not.  From the opening shot the familiarity of
Hitchcock at work is instant, and the amazing shots continue throughout the
film's duration. In one striking scene the camera follows the killer and his
next victim upstairs and into a hallway, but once the door closes behind them
as they enter the killer's apartment, the camera slowly backs down the hall,
the stairs and out of the apartment building and across the street.
     Though Richard is as drab a character as Henry Fonda's Manny Balestrero
was in Hitchcock's 1957 "The Wrong Man," Finch is believable as the
protagonist.  Black humor abounds, specifically in the scenes involving Chief
Inspector Oxford (Alec McCowen, in a terrific performance) and his wife (Vivien
Merchant).  Cinematography by Gil Taylor ("Dr. Strangelove," "Repulsion"),
script by Anthony Shaffer ("Sleuth," "The Wicker Man").  Look for the
director's signature cameo early on, during the crowd scene that precedes the
discovery of a Necktie killer victim.  Hitchcock's return to London (1950's
"Stage Fright," though a US venture, was shot there) is memorable and quite
engrossing, "Frenzy" comes highly recommended.
